The present consensus paper recommends diagnostic and therapeutic procedures in HIVE and HIVM and outlines the current research.
Background: Prognostic data heart failure rely on epidemiological studies or large clinical trials.
These data are not to transfer easily on everyday practice.
Forty-nine patients (mean age, 54 years) admitted for displaced ankle fractures were observed retrospectively to determine by clinical examination and measurement of plantar pressure distribution whether successful surgical treatment of ankle fractures had led to gait symmetry.
The mean follow-up was 36 months (range, 19-54 months).
The deviation in gait was quantified using peak pressure.
Using a clinical score, most of the patients had satisfactory results.
The plantar pressure distribution showed significant load asymmetries of patients with satisfactory results and those with non-satisfactory results.
Dynamic gait analysis allows quantification of gait asymmetry and clinically non-visible gait disorder.
Comparison of radiation exposure applied by different types of CT scanners for the investigation of the chest and abdomen.
Determination of radiation exposure applied by multi-phase spiral CT. Estimation of the dose in air in the system axis of the scanner, the CT dose index (CTDI) and the effective dose for electron beam tomography (EBT) and two conventional CT scanners (sequence, SEQ; spiral, SCT).
For EBT, dose in system axis for investigation of the abdomen was above 50 mGy.
Effective dose for investigation of the chest and abdomen was higher with EBT (11 and 26 mSv, respectively) than with conventional CT (SEQ, 4 and 20 mSv; SCT, 2 and 7 mSv).
The effective dose for a biphasic investigation (liver 5 mSv, kidney 4 mSv) was below, for a triphasic investigation (liver 7 mSv) above the effective dose of the investigastion of the abdomen (6 mSv).
Investigation of the abdomen with the EBT should only be performed for certain indications.
With spiral CT, effective dose is much lower than with EBT.
Bone fracture, soft-tissue trauma and hemorrhagic shock are frequent complications in trauma patients, and these patients are known to be immunocompromised.
Nonetheless, it is difficult to differentiate the effect of soft-tissue trauma plus hemorrhage from that of bone fracture and hemorrhage on host immune function in the clinical setting.
To determine this experimentally, closed bone fracture (right lower leg) and/or soft-tissue trauma (2.5 cm midline laparotomy) were induced prior to hemorrhagic shock (mean arterial BP of 35  +/-  5 mm Hg for 90 min) in male C3H/HeN mice.
All animals were killed at 72 h after initiation of the experiment and the spleens were collected aseptically.
More significant depression of splenocyte IL-2 and IL-3 release occurred with the combined insult than after bony injury or tissue trauma alone with hemorrhage.
The present study suggests that different traumatic insults, i. e. bone fracture as well as soft-tissue trauma in conjunction with hemorrhagic shock, produce comparable depression of host immune function.
Moreover, combination of closed bone fracture and soft-tissue trauma prior to hemorrhagic shock leads to even more compromised immunity.
This indicates that different mechanisms of immune depression may be involved following soft-tissue trauma or bony injury coupled with hemorrhage.
The markedly depressed immune function following bony injury, soft-tissue trauma and hemorrhagic shock may contribute to the increased susceptibility of severely injured patients to sepsis and the ensuing multiple organ failure in the clinical situation.
In the management of acute major vessel occlusion, the use of fibrinolytic agents such as recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (rt-PA), urokinase or streptokinase is widely accepted.
Today, the spectrum of indications for thrombolytic drugs comprises acute myocardial infarction, lung embolism, ischaemic stroke, deep vein thrombosis and acute arterial occlusions of the lower limbs.
In view of the histopathological and clinical features of retinal vessel occlusion, fibrinolysis aimed at early restoration of blood flow appears to be a promising therapeutic approach.
Basically, it is of some concern that the systemic administration of fibrinolytic agents is associated with a haemorrhagic risk.
Since this includes cerebral haemorrhage or gastrointestinal bleeding, the choice of an appropriate intravenous thrombolytic therapy in a non-life threatening situation such as central retinal artery occlusion (CRAO) or central retinal vein occlusion (CRVO) should be based on minimising the risk of adverse events.
Furthermore, the fibrinolytic treatment of choice should be able to produce rapid and complete restoration of retinal capillary and arterial or venous blood flow and maintain patency long enough for retinal salvage to take place.
In this article, we review several studies of fibrinolytic therapy in patients with retinal vessel occlusion to determine whether this treatment is likely to improve major clinical outcomes.
Moreover, we review the large scale trials of fibrinolysis in myocardial infarction and acute ischaemic stroke to evaluate safety and efficacy of various thrombolytic regimens.
Furthermore, we report on our results of fibrinolytic therapy with low dose rt-PA in patients with retinal artery occlusion and ischaemic central retinal vein occlusion.
In light of the fact that the occurrence of bleeding complications constitutes a dose dependent problem, we conclude that the use of low dose regimens should be the ideal approach to fibrinolysis in retinal vessel occlusion.
Although the results of our pilot studies must be interpreted with caution, we believe that the administration of low-dose rt-PA (50 mg) in a frontloaded manner ( = simultaneous administration of rt-PA and intravenous heparin) constitutes a reasonable treatment option in patients with central retinal artery occlusion (CRAO) or ischaemic retinal vein occlusion (RVO), recent onset of symptoms (CRAO <= 12 h, RVO <= 11 d) and severe visual loss ( <= 20/50).
Because of these limitations and the numerous contraindications of fibrinolytic therapy, only a limited number of patients will be suitable for this treatment.
In view of the poor visual and ocular prognosis in severe retinal vessel occlusion, controlled clinical trials are needed to determine the benefit of thrombolysis in the management of this disease.
This study was designed to determine the relationship between the electroencephalogram (EEG) and clinical signs of depth of anaesthesia during induction of anaesthesia by slow infusion of propofol (18 mg/kg - h).
The object of this study was to evaluate currently published data regarding extragenital neoplasia induced by HRT.
Objective: This study was designed to investigate the differences between TIVA with propofol/remifentanil (P/R) and balanced anaesthesia with sevoflurane/fentanyl (S/F) in gynaecological laparoscopic surgery.
Emphasis was put on haemodynamic reaction, recovery profile, postoperative side effects and patient satisfaction.
Confluent and reticulated papillomatosis (CRP) is a rare dermatosis of unknown aetiology.
Recent electron microscopic studies suggest that CRP is a disorder of keratinisation.
In our case we could not confirm the previously reported ultrastructural findings.
CRP is generally resistant to therapy.
We treated a 19-year-old patient with typical CRP with oral minocycline.
Within a few weeks the eruption resolved completely.
A mild relapse 7 months later responded promptly to a repeated course of minocycline.
Twelve months after discontinuatin of therapy there is no evidence of recurrence.
In CRP minocycline should be preferred to systemic retinoid therapy because of its minor side effects.
Wound instillation seems to be an easy and preferable way to achieve postoperative analgesia in pediatric hernioplasty.
This prospective, randomized and double-blinded pilot-study was initiated to gain preliminary information in order to define the appropriate concentration of local anaesthetic for efficient posthernioplastic analgesia.
The recommended infusion time for i.v.
prostaglandin E 1 (PGE1) therapy is 2 or 3 h, depending on the dose.
The aim of the present multicentre study was to investigate, for the first time, whether the dose of 60 µg PGE1 is effective and well tolerated with shorter infusion times.
A total of 118 patients with intermittent claudication and a pain-free walking distance between 50 and 200 m (3 km/h, 12%) were randomized to receive an i.v.
infusion of 3 ampoules Prostavasin (60 µg PGE1) administered for either 1 or 2 h, once a day for 4 weeks.
Primary variables were pain-free walking distance as well as safety, determined by the frequency of adverse events and the course of blood pressure.
The efficacy was comparable in the two groups.
In the 1-h infusion group, the pain-free walking distance increased from 87 to 135 m, and in the 2-h group from 88 to 147 m, while the absolute walking distance increased from 124 to 200 m and from 147 to 238 m, respectively.
The differences between the two groups were not significant, although an analysis of subgroups with initial pain-free walking distances of less than 80 m indicated a significant difference in favour of the 2-h PGE1 infusion (increase in walking distance 58 m as compared with 22 m).
Course of blood pressure and frequency of adverse events were comparable in the two groups.
Altogether, in intermittent claudication both the 1-h and the 2-h PGE1 infusion show comparably good results in terms of efficacy and safety.
Patients with an initial pain-free walking distance of less than 80 m seem to reveal a major benefit after a 2-h PGE1 infusion.
The problem in the treatment of deep hyalin cartilage defects is due to the minimal regeneration potential of this specific tissue.
Several attempts were made to solve this difficulties experimentally and clinically.
The proliferative potential of autogenous perichondrium/periost is well-known for decades.
Gender identity change in intersexual patients is rare.
We report on the transsexual development of a patient with male pseudohermaphroditism.
The case report emphasizes the importance of a thorough differential diagnosis.
Fractionated irradiation with X-rays or megavoltage is an important therapeutic option in the palliative treatment of Kaposi's sarcoma.
We report on three HIV patients demonstrating bullous cutaneous eruptions in the irradiation field.
Three homosexual men (age 45-60 y) stage of disease CDC 3C, were treated with fractionated soft X-rays with the scheme conventionally used by us (total dose 30 Gy, single doses 3 Gy).
Immediately to three days after completion of treatment large blisters appeared within the irradiation field, resolving after 2-4 weeks, leaving postinflammatory hyperpigmentation.
The cause of this rare reaction to soft X-ray therapy, potentially suggesting an individually altered radiation sensitivity, is so far unknown.
Controlled prospective studies applying different fractionation schemes will be necessary to better elucidate this issue.
Due to the decreased trauma in anterior as well as posterior surgical approaches to the spine, microsurgical techniques have been used more frequently in recent years.
This article describes two new microsurgical techniques to approach the anterior lumbar spine for interbody fusion as part of a posterior-anterior stabilization concept in various diseases like spondylolisthesis, degenerative instability; failed back surgery syndrome, fractures etc.
The lumbar segments L 2-5 are approached through a blunt muscle-splitting retroperitoneal technique.
The antero-lateral circumference of the motion segment is exposed with a frame-type retractor which is anchored in the adjacent vertebral bodies with anchoring screws.
The lumbosacral junction is exposed via a mini-laparotomy using a special soft tissue spreader.
Interbody fusion is described with autogeneous bone grafts.
Preliminary experience with 83 patients treated between 1995 and 1996 show that peri- and postoperative morbidity is low.
Clinical as well as radiological results are comparable to the standard techniques.
Spectrum as well as rate of complications so far do not differ from those described in the literature for non-microsurgical approaches.
The posterior cruciate ligament (PCL) is the strongest ligament of the human knee joint.
Its origin is at the lateral wall of the medial femoral condyle and the insertion is located in the posterior part of the intercondylar area.
The posterior cruciate ligament consists of multiple small fiber bundles.
From a functional point of view, one can differentiate fiber bundles with an anterior origin and fiber bundles with a posterior origin at the femur.
The anterior fibers insert in the anterolateral part of the tibial insertion zone.
These fibers become tense when the knee is flexed.
The posterior fibers insert in the posteromedial part of the tibial insertion and become tense when the knee is extended.
The main part of the posterior cruciate ligament consists of type I collagen positive dense connective tissue.
The longitudinal fibrils of type I collagen are divided into small bundles by thin type III collagen positive fibrils.
In the center of the middle third region, the structure of the tissue varies from the typical structure of a ligament.
In this region, the structure of the tissue resembles fibrocartilage.
Oval-shaped cells surrounded by a metachromatic extracellular matrix lie between the longitudinal collagen fibrils.
The femoral origin and the tibial insertion have the structure of chondral apophyseal enthesis.
Near the anchoring region at the femur and tibia there should be various mechanoreceptors which might have an important function for the kinematics of the knee joint.
The blood supply of the PCL arises from the middle geniculate artery.
The ligament is covered by a synovial fold where the terminal branches of the middle and the inferior geniculate artery form a periligamentous network.
From the synovial sheath, the blood vessels penetrate the ligament in a transverse direction and anastomose with a longitudinally orientated intraligamentous network.
The distribution of blood vessels within the PCL is not homogeneous.
We detected three avascular areas within the ligament: Both fibrocartilaginous entheses of the PCL are devoid of blood vessels.
A third avascular zone is located in the central zone of fibrocartilage of the middle third region.
Atrial reentrant tachycardias (ART) are a potentially life-threatening complication in survivors of congenital heart disease surgery.
From July 1993 to December 1997, temporary transesophageal pacing was used to convert 29 tachycardia episodes in 19 patients.
At the time of the first tachycardia episode, patients' ages were 1 month to 26 years (mean 9.8 yrs).
Time from operation to onset of first tachycardia episode ranged from 1 day to 19 years.
Onset was within the first 2 weeks postoperatively in 6 patients and occurred later in 13 patients (1 to 19 years after operation).
Postoperative pacemaker implantation had been performed in 2 pts; 17 of 19 pts were receiving antiarrhythmic medication.
After placing a quadripolar transesophageal catheter, atrial and ventricular signals were recorded and atrial stimulation performed.
Atrial cycle length of tachycardia ranged from 160-380 ms with 1:1 to 4:1 AV conduction.
Temporary transesophageal pacing was performed following an algorithm starting with 4 extrastimuli (20 ms below atrial cycle length of tachycardia).
Tachycardia terminated in 27 of 29 cases (93%) without complications.
In 3 cases, conversion was achieved by pacing after amiodarone 5 mg/kg i.v.
After tachycardia conversion, sinus- or pacemaker rhythm was present in 20 cases.
In 9 cases atrial fibrillation was recorded; spontaneous conversion to sinus rhythm occurred after a maximum of 3 min (7 cases) or persisted and required direct current cardioversion (2 cases).
In conclusion, transesophageal atrial pacing is an effective, relatively noninvasive method for conversion of atrial reentrant tachycardias after operation for congenital heart disease.
After elucidating the components and theory of neuroticism (N) as well as of psychosomatic complaints and their relationships to personality dimensions and to psychosomatic diseases, comparisons are performed between patients suffering from fibromyalgia syndrome (FMS) or related pain diseases with healthy subjects scoring high on personality dimensions related to neuroticism.
FMS and pain patients score high on depression, anxiety, and experience of stress although questionnaire scores on depression are higher in subjects not exhibiting somatic features of the disease.
High subjective pain sensitivity and low thresholds for pain perception are also common features in high N subjects and FMS patients.
On the endocrinological level cortisol responses to challenge tests with CRH as well as prolactin responses to TRH are higher in FMS patients than in high N healthy subjects indicating an endocrinological difference.
A common feature, however, is the lack of adapatability in the two groups, since neurotics are in particular characterized by a low capacity to shift their behavior from one state to the other (waking-sleeping, working-relaxing), to re-adapt to baseline levels after endocrinological or physiological stress responses, or to adjust to conditions of shift work.
This is reflected by chronobiological disturbances in FMS patients and could also explain their maintainance of pain perception, because they are incapable of correcting conditioned pain-producing muscle tension.
Purpose: To document our experience with spiral hydro-CT of the pancreas based on a combination of pharmacologic intestinal paralysis and water distension of the stomach and duodenum with specific reference to tumor detection rate, differentiation of malignant versus benign tumors and assessment of tumor resectability in a prospective study on 211 consecutive patients.
Since the publication of a case of Syphilis transmission by blood transfusion in 1915 the discussion about transfusion-associated bacterial infection is ongoing.
For some time, virus infections through blood and blood products have been highlighted.
However, in the last years the attention required has been drawn to the problem of transmission of bacteria.
In this publication the present situation concerning the contamination rates through blood components and the frequency of transfusion-associated microbial infections is outlined.
The bacteria involved are discussed.
Furthermore, the state of the art for prevention and diagnosis as well as the methods for inactivation of bacteria are assessed.
While working to develop a distal locking device, we analyzed distal nail position with reference to nail deformation and a radiographic-morphometric investigation.
The amount and the direction of implant deformation in unslotted stainless steel unreamed tibial nails (Synthes) were analyzed.
Measurement of implant deformation (3 translations, 3 angles) in the center of the distal transverse locking hole was performed with a 3D magnetic motion tracker system before and after nail insertion.
Unreamed tibial nails (diameter 8 mm, n = 10; diameter 9 mm, n = 10) were inserted in paired human cadaver tibiae.
The results showed lateral translations of -4.5+/-3.5 mm (mean and standard deviation, range 14.3 mm) and dorsal translations of -7.8+/-5.8 mm (mean and standard deviation, range 19.2 mm).
Rotational deformations around the longitudinal axis of the nail were 0.3+/-0.7 ° (mean and standard deviation, range 2.4 °).
The results showed, that a simple aiming arm, mounted on the proximal nail end, alone or even in combination with a large working channel (e.g.
10 mm in diameter), was not adequate to the aiming process.
A radiographic-morphometric analysis was subsequently performed in 40 tibiae after experimental (n = 20) or clinical (n = 20) implantation of nails 8 mm and 9 mm in diameter.
These measurements showed a relatively constant distance between the upper distal transverse hole and the anterior aspect of the tibia (average 12.3 mm and only a narrow range (7.6 mm).
These data were the basis for the development of an aiming technique that exploits the relatively constant distance between the distal nail hole and the anterior aspect of the tibia.
The goal of the Interdisciplinary Longitudinal Study of Aging (ILSE) is to assess healthy and satisfying aging in middle adulthood and later life.
In addition, this study compares adults from eastern and western Germany.
The data for this study were collected between late 1993 and early 1996 as part of the first measurement point of the ILSE.
Five-hundred and one participants from the Leipzig region were compared with 500 participants from the Heidelberg area on four specific dimensions: personality, cognitive functioning, subjective well-being, and health.
Age differences were obtained for neuroticism, extraversion, openness, and agreeableness.
Differences were also obtained in cognitive functioning and health.
Regional differences between eastern and western Germany were obtained in the personality dimensions neuroticism, openness and conscientiousness, as well as in subjective well-being.
Significant age by region interactions were obtained for openness and some of the cognitive measures, as well as for the physicians' health ratings of the participants, suggesting selective historical effects.
The results are discussed with respect to functional abilities and levels of satisfaction in midlife, as well as with respect to regional differences that might be due to prior political system differences in the east and west.
Modern obstetrics must try to maintain high safety standards for both mother and child and, at the same time, satisfy the general desire of women for natural birth.
Standards of safety are based on early recognition of high risks, allowing early intervention to prevent serious complications.
A considerable number of diagnostic and therapeutic measures recommended on a prophylactic basis and therefore widely used are responsible for the medical-technical image associated with modern obstetrics.
The benefits of most of these prophylactically recommended activities are unproven or low relative to the unavoidable side effects and the costs associated with widespread application.
There is good scientific proof that routine application of fetal heart rate monitoring during labor and delivery is associated with an increase in the rate of cesarean sections as well as operative vaginal deliveries without any clear benefit to the newborn in terms of a decrease in mortality or morbidity.
In a population of healthy women with uncomplicated pregnancies, the prevalence of perinatal mortality or morbidity is so low that even with meta-analysis of several studies the numbers remain too small to show significant differences for these rare events.
In high-risk cases the routine application of fetal heart rate monitoring throughout labor and delivery is undisputed and leads to a significant drop in morbiditiy and mortality of the baby.
With careful selection of pregnant women a combination of electronic fetal heart rate monitoring and auscultation during certain segments of the first stage of labor provides adequate surveillance.
We report the history of a 38 year old patient who began to develop mental deterioration at the age of 26.
After a time of 7 years neurological signs like writing dystonia occured.
Hallervorden-Spatz-Desease (HSD) was diagnosed at the age of 36 in vivo with the clinical presentation of severe dystonia, rigidity, dementia, and typical signal loss in the globus-pallidus the reticular part of the substantia nigra, and the nucleus ruber in the T-2 weighted MRI.
The "eye-of-the-tiger"-sign, a bilateral hyperintensity in the rostral globus pallidus, was not observed in follow-up examinations.
HSD is a rare autosomal-recessive or sporadic disease of unknown etiology.
In one third of the patients a dementing process is the first clinical sign of the disorder, and is a rare differential diagnosis of early onset dementia.
In 33 patients with chronic venous incompetence (CVI) caused by primary varicoses or postthrombotic syndrome stage I-III (according to Widmer) the therapeutic benefit of 6 months of medically supervised physical exercise training was documented.
During the training penud there was an improvement in subjective complains such as pain and tendency for edema in the legs.
Mobility in the upper ankle joint was improved asuss as venous drainage function.
Clinical benefit was achieved in the reduction of ulcer size; 7 of 10 ulcers completely healed.
Medically supervised physical exercise training and optimized compression therapy are basic therapeutic approaches in conservative treatment in chronic venous insufficiency.
Costs are covered by the patient's health insurance company in Germany, as long as the exercise training is medically supervised.
Epileptic seizures may alter autonomic functions.
This is especially the case with complex focal seizures (of temporal lobe origin) and grand mal.
Most frequently, such seizures cause ictal tachycardia, sometimes tachypnea, probably caused by the propagation of epileptic discharges to autonomic cerebral structures.
Ictal bradycardia and asystole are rare phenomena.
However, they may be life threatening.
Their differentiation from primary cardiac arrest is possible by the use of ictal EEG and ECG registration.
Postictal serum prolactin measurement does not differentiate syncope from seizure.
However, a postictal increase of creatine kinase is only measured after epileptic seizures and not after syncope.
Treatment of such epileptic seizures includes an optimization of anticonvulsant drug therapy and the implantation of a cardiac demand stimulator.
There is growing evidence that ictal asystole is a cofactor in sudden unexplained death in epileptic patients.
A minimal documentation system (MIDOS) has been developed for self-assessment of pain and other symptoms by the patients on palliative care units.
To decrease the administrative burden and thereby increase the acceptance of the system an electronic database was developed to facilitate data entry and documentation.
Background: Hearing loss can be found in more than 50% of children with Down syndrome.
Chronic or recurrent middle-ear effusions are considered the most frequent etiology with an incidence of 60%.
Microcystic adnexal carcinoma is a rare semimalignant cutaneous neoplasm characterised by slow but locally aggressive growth.
Its histogenesis and nomenclature are still a subject of controversy.
Under-recognition and the tumour's bland cytologic features lead to frequent misdiagnoses.
In addition, subclinical tumour invasion explains the high incidence of local recurrence.
Thus, the tumour makes great demands on the planning of its surgical removal.
We report the case of an 81-year-old woman with a microcystic adnexal carcinoma of the lower lip, which was treated by micrographic surgery.
On the basis of this case, differential diagnoses, histogenesis and micrographic surgery as the treatment of choice are discussed.
In old age, individualization processes also simultaneously effect the opportunity and necessity to shape one's life.
Societal orientation dissipates, and the certainties of earlier times disappear.
Plurality and option appear as an increasing twofold challenge to coping with life.
These ambiguities characterize modern old age.
Or in other words: the biographization of old age has begun.
Posttraumatic cardiopulmonary resuscitation (CPR) is associated with a poor outcome.
When evaluating the literature according to the Utstein method, there were only 2 survivors (0.18%) out of 1,135 CPR attempts after trauma (Table 1).
Differences in the study populations and levels of prehospital trauma care led us to analyse the results of a physician-staffed prehospital trauma care system in Cologne.
From January 1987 to December 1990, a total of 49,054 emergency calls were registered using a standardised protocol.
Among 9,595 trauma-related calls, 636 patients were found to be pulseless on arrival of the emergency team, 412 of these were pronounced dead.
CPR was initiated in the remaining 224 patients, who comprise the study population (defined as 100%).
All patients who were admitted to a hospital were followed using a second protocol.
CPR in the field was successful in 68 (30.4%) patients, who were then admitted to a hospital; 42 of these died within the first 24 h. Four patients (1.8%) could be discharged from hospital alive and were still living 1 year later, 1 with a lasting neurological deficit (Fig.
In 156 (69.6%) cases resuscitative attempts were unsuccessful in the field.
Even in a physician-staffed prehospital trauma care system, the chance of surviving a post-traumatic cardiac arrest is minimal.
Survival has to be regarded as an individual fate; the overall results are discouraging.
Even though this study analyses the largest population of posttraumatic CPR ever published, prognostic factors could not be identified due to the few survivors.
Nevertheless, the result does not justify general omission of CPR after trauma as: (1) prognostic factors for survival have not been identified thus far; and (2) no significant additional costs arise from posttraumatic CPR.
Functional voiding disturbances can be due to failure of the detrusor or to discoordinated sphincter function during micturition.
Therapeutical options are directed either to strengthening the contraction up to an adequate magnitude or to lowering the voiding resistance or can be aimed at influencing both.
In a brief survey mechanical, pedagogical, electrotherapeutical, and surgical measures as well as drug treatment are critically examined.
Conservative methods should always be attempted before surgical procedures are performed.
Depending on the degree of severity and the etiology of the disease, a combined therapy can be useful.
In the case of resistance to therapy, intermittent autocatheterism is to be preferred to permanent deviation via an indwelling catheter.
During long-term therapy of hyperuricaemia with allopurinol (300 mg/d) two patients developed generalized granuloma annulare.
The diagnoses were confirmed by histology; concomitant diseases, especially diabetes mellitus, were not detectable.
Following discontinuation of allopurinol therapy, cutaneous granulomas healed without relapse.
Hyperuricaemia could be controlled by low-purine diet and medication avoiding allopurinol.
The clinical history of our two patients suggested a causal connection between allopurinol therapy and generalized granuloma annulare.
For this reason we rate the development of this disease in both cases as a rare but significant side effect of allopurinol.
This should give rise to critical assessment of concomitant drug therapy during development of generalized granuloma annulare.
Background: Aim of the present prospective longitudinal study was the statistical foundation and thus further replication of recent findings of Hasenbring [13], who postulated a significant importance of specific, within the psychological pain research long neglected pain coping strategies as risk factors concerning pain chronification: appeals to "stick it out" on the cognitive level and endurance strategies on the behavioural level.
Intraarticular bleeding and muscle bleeding occur spontaneously or as a result of trauma in hemophilia A or B.
The most common sites for hemarthrosis are the knees joints, elbows and ankles joints.
Resorption of intraarticular blood induces reactive hemophilic synovitis.
Hyperplasia of the synovium can be followed by recurrent bleedings.
These early reactions can change to a chronic synovitis and cause cartilage damage, finally resulting in a complete destruction of the joint.
Since 1981 158 adults and 61 children with a hemophilia A or B were treated at the Center for hemophilic disorders Frankfurt in an interdisciplinary approach.
Consequent prophylactic treatment with factor substitution can prevent the incidence of severe hemarthrosis.
Minor joint bleedings are treated by adequate factor substitution, temporarily non-weight bearing of the extremity, application of ice-packs and physical therapy.
More severe joint hemorrhages should be aspirated in order to reduce the acute synovitis.
This is followed by a consequent physical therapy (joint and soft tissue techniques) and anti-inflammatory drugs.
The goal is a sufficient muscular balance of the joint, the improvement of the coordination, and the proprioception.
The chronic synovitis is less painful and poorly responses to conservative interventions.
Local ice application, sytemic and local anti-inflammatory treatment support the physical therapy.
Soft heel shock absorber, elastic and semi-rigid bandages prevent recurrent bleeding episodes by shock absorption and decrease of synovial impingement.
Synovectomy is indicated in cases of chronic persistent synovitis.
Radiosynoviorthesis (RSO), which is an alternative in certain cases, has been performed with great success in 12 cases in our hospital.
In advanced arthropathy joint mobilization should be the emphasis of the physical therapy.
Bandages, crutches and ortopaedic shoe devices improve the walking capacity.
Over an 18-month period findings of stress X-ray of the ankle and medical records of 112 cases were analyzed retrospectively as to indications, results and therapeutic consequences.
The analysis showed that critical setting of indications can reduce the frequency of stress X-ray of the ankle and thus lower the total costs.
The introduction of guidelines could be advantageous at medical training institutions.
A 72-year-old patient received 0.1 mg morphine by the intrathecal route and 2x1.5 mg midazolam as adjuvant therapy.
Severe respiratory depression and somnolence supervened 3.5 h later, which lasted over the next 24 h and necessitated intubation and mechanical ventilation.
Continuous administration of >6 mg naloxone to antagonize the supposed effect of the morphine had no effect.
The patient's condition was not normalized until a single dose of 0.3 mg flumazenil was administered.
For the time being, especially in the case of elderly patients, we recommend that strict indications are adhered to when intrathecal administration of morphine is considered and that less than 0.1 mg morphine is given.
Respiration should be monitored for quite some time.
In contrast to the often debated NYHA classification, the determination of peak oxygen uptake (peak VO2) by cardiopulmonary exercise testing allows an objective assessment of the exercise capacity of patients with congestive heart failure (CHF).
However, cardiopulmonary exercise testing is a time consuming and costly diagnostic tool, which requires sophisticated equipment and specially trained personell.
Exercise capacity can also be determined by the 6 minute walk test.
This test simply measures the distance covered by strong walking on a hallway level within 6 minutes.
The 6 minute walk test is a submaximal exercise test, which is associated with much smaller increments in heart rate, blood pressure and plasma catecholamines than cardiopulmonary exercise testing.
It is characterized by a very small intraindividual variance.
Furthermore, it can be easily performed and, due to low logistic and personal requirements, it is very cost effective.
The results of the 6 minute walk test - as well as of cardiopulmonary exercise testing - are influenced by extracardial exercise-limiting disorders, such as pulmonary diseases.
Independent from the etiology of CHF, the results of the 6 minute walk test are closely related to peak VO2.
In serial exercise testing the distance covered within 6 minutes allow to predict the individual peak VO2.
Like peak VO2 the 6 minute walk test has been shown to be a predictor of morbidity and mortality in CHF, with its predictive value being independent from left ventricular ejection fraction and other potential prognostic parameters.
In CHF patients a walking distance < 300 m is associated with a one-year-mortality of up to 50%, whereas the one-year-mortality in patients reaching a walking distance > 450 m amounts to only a few percent.
In addition, the hospitalization rate of patients reaching a walking distance of < 300 m is several fold higher than in those with a walking distance >= 450 m. Like cardiopulmonary exercise testing, the 6 minute walk test allows to control the efficiency of specific treatments and to monitor the natural course of the disease.
The 6 minute walk test is, thus, a cost effective alternative to cardiopulmonary exercise testing in CHF patients.
However, neither the 6 minute walk test alone nor the results of cardiopulmonary exercise testing alone are sufficient for selecting patients, e.g., for cardiac transplantation, as each individual case requires a synopsis of all relevant facts and parameters.
We report the first case of prurigo pigmentosa in the German literature.
For over a year, a 16-year old white girl developed an immensely pruritic symmetrical reticular, papulo-vesicular eruption on the trunk, axillae and pubic region.
Histologically a superficial  perivascular spongiotic and lichenoid  inflammatory pattern with prominent pigmentary incontinence in older lesions was observed.
Topical corticosteroids and  systemic antihistamines had no effect.
Systemic corticosteroids and diaminophenylsulphone (DADPS) produced improvement but could not prevent recurrences.
Healing  occurred only after 4 weeks of systemic- minocycline.
Following parenteral administration, clonidine has analgesic effects at both cerebral and spinal levels.
Patient-controlled analgesia (PCA) makes it possible to determine equipotent dosages of analgesics by relating analgesic consumption per time to the levels of analgesia obtained in comparable patient populations.
Therefore, we studied the equipotency ratios of clonidine and piritramide and the incidence of undesired side effects in the treatment of postoperative pain in patients undergoing maxillo-facial surgery.
The effects of glycerol are discussed in detail.
Glycerol can lead to a transition of crystalline lipid structures within the horny layer lipids into liquid crystalline states.
Especially if applied in oil/water-emulsions it improves, the hydration of the horny layers better than urea.
In addition, if facilitates the dissolution of desmosomes within the superior layers of the horny layer enhancing desquamation.
Furthermore, by using glycerol, the mechanical properties of the skin can be influenced; long term used leads to increased elasticity.
The roughness of the horny layer is reduced, which can be explained by the abrasive and/or the hydrating effect.
Glycerol used in o/w-emulsions also protects against the influence of tensides or noxious lipophilic agents.
Presumably a flux from the base of the epidermis towards its surface triggers the regeneration of the barrier.
Finally,  glycerol can lead - similarly to urea - to an improvement in active agent penetration, as has been proven for hexylnicotinate.
Background: An 18-year-old woman presented with thyrotoxic symptoms - right sided lid retraction and exophthalmus.
She complained of diplopia on lateral gaze.
Laboratory investigations confirmed Grave's disease with hyperthyroidism and TSH receptor antibodies.
Atrial tachyarrhythmias significantly reduce quality of life in a surprisingly large number of patients.
The safe and effective treatment of atrial tachyarrhythmias is being intensively studied.
Internal electrical cardioversion of atrial fibrillation has been shown to be an effective non-pharmacological treatment option.
Cardioversion therapy has been applied in the absence of a clear understanding of the mechanisms governing the process.
Recent measurements of atrial transmembrane potentials using sophisticated optical mapping techniques reveal that internal cardioversion shocks cause changes in repolarization time that favor annihilation of wave fronts.
Thus, mechanisms of atrial cardioversion appear to be similar to ventricular defibrillation.
Further studies are needed to determine whether cardioversion mechanisms differ for chronic atrial fibrillation compared to acute atrial fibrillation.
Plasmocytic non-Hodgkin's lymphoma is the most common tumor of bone and bone marrow, typically diagnosed by symptoms such as monoclonal paraproteinemia, proteinuria, anemia and hypercalcemia.
In its progress, deposits of amyloids in  almost all organs can be observed.
However, plasmacytomas which are diagnosed by macroglossia of primarily unknown etiology are rare.
This case report presents a 61-year-old woman who suffered from a persistent swelling of the tongue with painful ulcerations.
A biopsy led to the diagnosis of primary systemic amyloidosis of the light-chain type, which subsequently proved to be a plasmacytoma with lambda light-chains stage II after Durie and Salmon.
In the course of the disease the patient developed further deposits of amyloids in the whole gastro-enteric system.
Macroglossia as a primary manifestation of plasmacytoma is rarely described in medical literature.
However, reports on deposits of amyloid in the tongue in advanced stages of disease are well known.
Aim: Improved detection of pulmonary-venous pathologies by imaging the pulmonary veins without arterial overlay.
For the histological verification of suspicious non-palpable small breast tumors, the three-dimensional breast biopsy applied as cylindrical extirpation using the ABBI system is the optimal solution at present.
Because of the possibility of performing mammography during the operation, errors of localization can be corrected and incorrect incisions avoided.
Taking the three radiomorphologically leading symptoms into consideration - suspicious microcalcification, focal shadow and structural irregularity - it can be stated that the digital mammography of the ABBI system is more sensitive than the conventional one for detecting microcalcification, but focal shadow and structural irregularity are detected less well by digital technique.
These structures should be preoperatively marked by using sonography.
After the complete removal of suspicious microcalcification checked by digital mammography during the operation, residual tumor might be found in a second excision when histologically invasive or intraductal tumor terminations reach the excision margin (R1 resection).
Thirteen invasive and 8 intraductal carcinomas were found in 80 cases of cylindrical extirpation using the ABBI system.
In 7 procedures carried out to exclude an in-breast recurrence, 3 intraductal carcinomas and 1 invasive carcinoma were observed.
In 8 of 12 invasive carcinomas and in 1 of 5 intraductal carcinomas, breast-conserving therapy was indicated.
Two cases of invasive carcinoma fulfilled the criteria applied (minimal tumor-free margin > 2 mm, no extensive intraductal component) to use the ABBI cylinder as lumpectomy without a second excision to follow.
With the increasing number of patients surviving after therapeutic intervention for congenital heart disease (CHD), accurate and frequent follow-up of their morphologic and functional cardiovascular status is required, preferably with a noninvasive imaging technique.
In a retrospecitve multicenter study we followed-up 30 fractures of the neck of the femur in children aged 11 years (1.5-15 years) for 4.8 years (0.5-20.0 years).
It is the aim of this study to analyse factors possibly related to outcome, like age at injury, type of fracture, interval between injury and treatment, method of stabilization and postoperative interval until full weight bearing.
At follow-up subjective parameters (pain, weather sensitiveness), clinical parameters (range of motion, claudication, leg length discrepancies) and radiological parameters (hip series) were investigated and medical charts and roentgenograms were reviewed using a standardized protocol.
29 of 30 children (96.7 %) have sustained displaced fractures.
Non-operative treatment has been applied in 4 children.
26 femoral neck fractures (type I: 1, type II: 8, type III: 17) were stabilized by internal fixation using screws and/or pins.
Following non-operative treatment one child suffered a coxa vara and another child suffered a avascular femoral head necrosis in combination with coxa vara and leg length shortening of 4 cm.
Following operative treatment 9 of 26 children (34.6 %) sufferred a avascular femoral head necrosis and 3 children (11.5 %) suffered a coxa vara.
In 6 of 26 children (23 %) we observed leg length discrepancies > 2 cm.
We were not able to demonstrate any significant follow-up result differencies between the groups of children who have sustained type II or type III fractures, or between the groups of children aged < 10 years when compared to children aged > 10 years, or between the group of children who were operated on within 6 hours after the accident when compared to the group of children operated > 6 hours after the accident.
We observed no significant follow-up result differences between the groups of children who had different intervals between operation and full weight bearing.
Operative fracture management remains the treatment of choice in the majority of displaced femoral neck fractures in children.
However, in our limited study we were not able to demonstrate any significant follow-up result differences between the group of children treated by immediate open reduction and internal fixation (interval injury - operation < 6 hours) when compared to children who had been operated > 6 hours after the injury.
Evidence based standards for structure quality in out-patient management of chronic pain states do not exist.
Therefore we tried to evaluate if german standards for outpatient management of chronic pain states which are based on opinions of experts for pain management influence the outcome quality of independent physicians for treatment of chronic low back pain.
Objective: The aim of this study was to compare low dose dopamine and dopexamine with respect to of liver-venous oxygen saturation, oxygen delivery and - demand, liver function tests and cardiocirculatory effects  in the reperfusion period during a hemihepatectomy operation with occlusion of the liver hilus.
Facial trauma is frequent and mainly caused by motor vehicle accidents.
Due to this main etiologic factor, trauma to the facial skeleton is often associated with serious injuries, commonly involving the brain, chest or abdomen.
As a consequence, the initial clinical management of these patients includes control of hemorrhage and immediate assessment of life-threatening injuries, including the maintenance of the airways.
Patients presenting with facial trauma are initially evaluated with a systematic clinical examination because many fractures can be accurately diagnosed by inspection and palpation alone.
In these cases plain film radiographs serve only for confirmation and documentation of the diagnosis.
In many other cases accompanying and extensive soft tissue swelling may clinically obscure fractures.
A complete and accurate evaluation of these patients requires additional radiological imaging methods.
A series of plain films may be generally sufficient but in most of the cases they can be regarded as initial screening methods for more thorough diagnosis with computed tomography (CT).
In trauma patients CT is the imaging method of choice because it shows more fracture lines and displaced fragments than any other imaging modality.
CT delineates soft tissue and bony structures and can localize and even characterize foreign bodies.
A complete and accurate characterization of the fracture type and potentially associated complications is mandatory for the appropriate treatment and can only be achieved by careful radiological (CT) evaluation.
On the basis of the claims data of the statutory health insurance funds, surgery rates and small-area variations within the catchment area of the AOK Magdeburg were examined for the year 1997.
Substantial variation can be constantly seen.
The extremal quotient at the 30 most frequent ICPM groups ranged from 2 to 5.
Generally, the extent of the variation was larger with elective procedures than with acute.
Correlation analyses do not show clear associations with hospital bed supply and physician density in primary sectors.
The extent of the small-area variation requires further research to evaluate possible determinants of surgery rates.
Criteria for hospital admission and indications for surgery should be made explicit.
Between 1984 and 1994 the legally required task force "Advisory Committee to the German Federal Health Office in Matters of Approval and Review of Existing Medicines B3-Psychiatry, Neurology, Anesthesiology" analyzed and evaluated the CNS-active compounds that until then had only possessed a fictitious registration.
The evaluation was related to efficacy and safety within the indications claimed by the producers.
Reviews and monographies had to be established for 445 basic compounds.
One hundred positive and 30 negative monographies were published.
"Negative" indicates that none of the claimed indications could be accepted by the committee.
It is regrettable that the Federal Health Agency did not notice a considerable part of these negative evaluations until the present date.
The process of the "Aufbereitung" was stopped abruptly by the 5th amendment of the German Drug Law in August 1994, - a very doubtful political decision with respect to drug safety in this country.
Background: We attempted to illustrate connections between selected metabolic parameters and the inflammation course in patients after cataract operations.
Without a more detailed knowledge of etiology and pathogenesis of multiple sclerosis final conclusions regarding an association between physical trauma and the onset or course of multiple sclerosis cannot be drawn.
Only a few prospective studies which are appropriately designed to prove a putative correlation have been published.
A critical review of these studies and some case reports, in the light of the current pathophysiological concepts of multiple sclerosis, does not indicate a causal relationship between physical trauma and onset of multiple sclerosis or exacerbations.
We report on unusual presentation forms of Pneumocystis carinii infection of the lung in two patients with AIDS.
A 36-years-old woman presented a cavitation in the lung middle lobe and bullous changes in the apical portion of the right upper lobe on the chest x-ray.
The biopsy of these lesions was not diagnostic and the patient was operated on.
The surgical specimen of the removed lung segment showed a cavitary lesion with a border of granulation tissue with giant cells, focal recent and older hemorrhages, rests of fibrinous exudate and dystrophic calcifications.
In the surrounding tissue there were Pneumocystis carinii in the alveolar spaces and also in the alveolar walls, this tissue invasion through the organisms being most probably the cause of the cavitary change.
A cytomegalic virus infection was also found.
In aortic atresia, coronary perfusion normally occurs through retrograde blood flow in the ascending aorta.
We report on two patients with antegrade flow in the ascending aorta despite aortic atresia.
In one patient with hypoplastic left heart syndrome (aortic atresia, severe mitral stenosis), an intact interatrial septum/premature closure of the foramen ovale was found.
While no other way of left atrial or ventricular decompression was found, echocardiography, angiography and the post-mortem examination showed left ventricular to coronary sinusoids as the sole pathway for systemic oxygenation.
In a second patient with complex congenital heart disease, including aortic atresia, antegrade flow in the ascending aorta was through a left coronary fistula with shunt flow originating from the pulmonary trunc.
This report describes systemic perfusion depending on retrograde coronary flow due to coronary-cameral (sinusoids) and coronary arterio-venous fistulas leading to the phenomenon of antegrade blood flow in the ascending aorta despite aortic atresia.
The introduction of biosensor technology for near bedside measurement of plasma lactate concentrations has been a promising step for critical care profiling.
However, methodological drawbacks and relevant inaccuracy have been reported.
With the advent of a new biosensor (Chiron Diagnostics) and a revised NOVA Biomedical device, accuracy was expected to be improved.
The goal of the present investigation was to evaluate the accuracy of both methods.
The combined histological and microcomputed analysis of human iliac crest biopsies leads to major advances in our understanding of three-dimensional bone architecture.
Microcomputed tomography avoids the time-consuming reconstruction and artifacts of serial sections.
Furthermore, its high resolution allows the recording of structural differences as low as 10 mm.
Thus, three-dimensional analysis in combination with histological evaluation of cellular dynamics facilitates earlier and easier recording of changes of cancellous bone.
The aneurysmal bone cyst represents a tumorlike lesion, which does not occur frequently.
Every site of the skeleton may be involved.
Although it can be observed at any age, it distinctly predominates from 10 to 20 years of age.
Distinction of aneurysmatic bone cysts from certain benign or malignant bone tumours requires subtle imaging techniques and an experienced bone tumour pathologist.
Since the lesion shows a heterogeneous biological behaviour and typically occurs in the growing skeleton, a wide range of surgical procedures must be provided concerning tumour resection and defect reconstruction.
In the current retrospective study results of 41 surgically treated aneurysmal bone cysts, thereof 5 latent, 31 active, and 5 aggressive lesions, were investigated.
While morbidity due to the therapeutic measures was comparatively low even in extended lesions and demanding reconstructions, a recurrence rate of 19.5% had to be observed in our series.
Taking into consideration the biological activity of the lesion, analysis of the recurrences revealed inappropriate surgical margins had been chosen at the primary operation in all of these patients.
Since the risk of a local relapse is linked both to aggressiveness of the primary lesion and to surgical radicality, therapy of aneurysmal bone cyst requires preoperative staging and stage-dependent surgical procedures.
The RS3PE syndrome (Remitting Seronegative Symmetrical Synovitis with Pitting Edema) is a manifestation of rheumatoid arthritis in the elderly with a good prognosis.
It usually presents as an acute, symmetric polysynovitis with edema of the dorsum of the hands and feet.
Anti-inflammatory treatment with corticosteroids leads to prompt improvement.
We describe the case of an 81 year old man with a primarily unilateral manifestation involving the right hand.
A thrombosis of the axillary vein was suspected.
Within a few days he developed a pitting edema of the dorsum of the other hand.
Movement of both shoulders and wrists was painful.
Low-dose corticosteroid therapy resulted in a rapid improvement of the edema and the inflammatory symptoms.
The objective of this study was to determine the usefulness, safety and acceptance of a new technique of percutaneous implantation of port-catheter-systems (PIPS) for locoregional intraarterial chemotherapy of the liver.
From October 1994 to July 1996, 128 patients (30 women, 98 men) participated in an outpatient cardiac rehabilitation program (phase II).
Our objectives were to demonstrate risk-factor modification and increased work-load capacity resulting directly from the rehabilitation in terms of primary results and long-term effects, 6 months (n = 59) and 12 months (n = 30) after termination of the program.
We observed how many of the patients were able to be occupationally re-integrated after completion of phase II rehabilitation.
Here, we present the so-called "Vollmer retractor", which can be fixed on to the operating table.
It allows an optimal transference of the traction force on to the border of the wound, both in upper and lower abdominal interventions.
In this way, as shown by our recent experience, we gain an optimal view of the subdiaphragmatic area and into the small pelvis.
The disaster management in Germany is embodied in the constitution.
According to the German constitution the ministries of the interior of the federal states coordinate the disaster management by delegating it to the city and county administrations.
These elaborate and update a special disaster management calendar, which allows a prompt flow of information to and from the administration and the person in charge of operations and guarantees a smooth collaboration on which the success of the operation depends.
The American-European Consensus Conference recently recommended the following criteria for diagnosis of ARDS: (1) acute onset; (2) PaO2/FiO2<=200 mmHg regardless of PEEP level; (3) bilateral infiltrates seen on frontal chest radiograph; (4) PCWP <= 18 mmHg when measured or no clinical evidence of left atrial hypertension.
Pathophysiologically, ARDS is characterized by pulmonary edema owing to injury of the capillary-alveolar membranes and increased pulmonary artery pressure.
It is further distinguished by severe hypoxemia unresponsive to the usual methods of support for respiratory failure.
Hypoxemia is caused by intrapulmonary right-to-left shunting due to to persistent perfusion of non-ventilated alveoli.
Another characteristic feature in ARDS is the low thoracopulmonary compliance.
Latest studies suggest that the incidence of the syndrome is in the range of 3-10 cases / 100,000 inhabitants / year.
Mortality rates are a major concern: old and new reports continue to report mortality rates of 50-60%.
Thoracic organ transplantation has evolved as standard therapy in end-stage cardiac and pulmonary failure.
Meanwhile more than 50.000 heart, 2500 heart-lung and 10.000 lung transplantations have been performed worldwide.
Improvements in patient selection as well as in the postoperative management have led to 1-year survival rates of 70-90%.
Long-term results are still influenced by the development of graft vessels disease, bronchiolitis obliterans syndrome and malignancies.
Furthermore, indications and results of different procecures will be presented and new developments discussed.
The paper focuses on the cultural history of brain death in Germany in the second half of the 20th century.
It analyzes scientific and public discourses on the relevance of brain death and the importance of medical innovations in intensive care medicine.
The paper examines how the public reacted when heart transplantation led to an urgent need for a new definition of death.
It will be shown how the concept of brain death was accepted by the public, introduced into clinical routine, and implemented through medical and legal policies.
Finally, it will be analyzed why the public consensus on brain death was definitely questioned in the last ten years.
An understanding of the use of the concept of brain death by scientists, lawyers, theologians, and the public during the last three decades may help to shed light on the social role of science in modern and late-modern societies.
Background: In the course of Graves' disease (GD) the extraocular muscles become fibrotic after an acute inflammatory stage.
Differentiation of these two stages is important for therapy.
Injuries of the joints of the pelvis and of the acetabulum are still a problem even today.
When the joints of the pelvis are damaged the risk of complicated pelvic injuries, that is to say pelvic injuries with damage to the soft tissues in and around the pelvis, is increased threefold.
The lethality, the overall gravity of the injuries, the probability of haemorrhagic complications and the proportion of associated pelvic injuries are also increased.
Even when anatomical reconstruction of the lower limb girdle is achieved, long-term secondary conditions such as pain and genitourinary and neurological scquelae frequently persist.
Complicated pelvic injuries, i. e. pelvic injury with concomitant damage to organs and soft tissues in the pelvis and pelvic injuries with ipsilateral femoral fracture (floating hip) are special cases.
Haemodynamic stabilization of the patient and the treatment of organic lesions must be the first priorities in the interdisciplinary therapy.
Even when these priorities are correctly observed, the lethality is almost three times as high as in the case of pelvic injuries not involving soft-tissue damage.
Acetabular fractures are a particular challenge even compared with other joint fractures.
Operative treatment with anatomical joint reconstruction and stable internal fixation has been shown to have the best results.
In addition to the type of fracture and the personal experience of the surgeon concerned, such fracture-specific factors as the presence of further fractures of the posterior wall, comminuted fractures, joint depression fractures and intra-articular fragments increasingly play a part.
The long-term result worsens with increasing number of these additional pathologies.
The primary cartilaginous damage caused by the accident seems to have a considerable influence on the long-term result following acetabular fractures.
Two-dimensional conventional X-rays and computer tomographic imaging systems contribute to the diagnosis and surgical planning of patients with orofacial malformations.
The ability to reformat CT scans into three-dimensional osseous and soft tissue surface images has a significant impact on the diagnosis and management of orofacial malformations.
Cephalometric evaluation with teleradiography provides precise insight into both the skeletal structures and the soft parts, enabling the radiologist to assess the relationship among the different parts in a given subject, at any given time and in relation to the normal.
The purpose of this study was to check the precision of the Dräger vaporizer model 19.3 when filled with three different preparations of isoflurane.
Background: Since there is no epidemiologic assessment of the frequency of pain caused by tumor in Germany, tumor-pain-prevalence is estimated indirectly on the basis of mortality and median survival.
Knowing that about 50% of all patients having metastases or incurable locoregional recurrence suffer from pain every day, the product of median survival times mortality was calculated to achieve the number of patients' days with tumor-caused pain per year (82.710.690 days in Germany 1995).
By division with 365 (days), it is calculated that 226.605 patients require tumor pain related treatment at one day in Germany.
Another calculation based on Bonica's publications that 60-90% of patients suffering from advanced cancer are having pain and based on an estimated tumor prevalence 1989/90 revealed a tumor pain prevalence of 221.826.
Laser catheters which run eccentrically on a guide wire were developed for maximization of luminal gain by excimer laser angioplasty (ELCA).
We investigated the safety and efficacy of ELCA with these new catheters plus PTCA in patients with restenoses or occlusions in coronary stents.
The age of standardized instrumented scoliosis correction and stabilization began with Harrington instrumentation (HI).
With HI, satisfactory long-term correction of the frontal plane averaged approximately 50 %, but without notable derotational capabilities.The distraction of the concavity leads to reduction of the sagittal contour of the spine (flat back), which is biomechanically disadvantageous.
The newer multisegmentally attached implant systems avoid this disadvantage.
The first prototypes of these systems were Luque- (SSI) and Cotrel-Dubousset instrumentation.
Ideal indications for posterior instrumented curve correction are structural idiopathic double major curves and flexible single curves.
However, even with these newer doublerod systems derotation is low, because derotation is, without any doubt, related to anterior release and thus decoupling of the segments by means of disc resection.
Autoaggressive syndromes as causes of diseases underlying chronic blepharitis and keratoconjunctivitis that are refractory to treatment are often difficult to recognize.
The surgical correction of a tandem stenosis of the carotid artery is sometimes difficult, especially if the second stenosis is near or above the skull base.
Angioplasty and Stent implantation may offer an alternative to standard surgical procedures in the treatment of carotid stenoses in the future.
However, the potential advantages of these endovascular techniques warrant continued evaluation.
The application of these techniques in carotid artery tandem stenoses presents specific problems and dangers.
We discuss the case of a 78-year-old man with severe carotid stenoses on both sides and an additional symptomatic tandem stenosis above the skull base on the right side.
After the surgical correction of the left carotid artery using standard endarterectomy, we performed endarterectomy on the right side in combination with an open Stent implantation.
The periungual fibromas in tuberous sclerosis are also known as Koenen tumors.
Joannes Henricus Maria Koenen was born on March 10, 1893, in Eindhoven and died in Bois-le-Duc May 29, 1956.
From 1910 to 1918 he studied medicine at the University of Amsterdam.
Then he worked as a physician at the "Coudewater" asylum in Rosmalen and from 1929 in the "Voorburg" asylum in Vught.
In 1932 he published his publication concerning a family with tuberous sclerosis in which photographs of periungual fibromas are shown.
His thesis in 1933 at the University in Leiden was titled "Imbecility in children.
Its Importance in pedagogic and social regard, by reason of an investigation in some communities in Noord-Brabant".
Later he was appointed director of a state mental institution.
The periungual fibromas in tuberous sclerosis were first described by Richad Kothe in Munich in 1903.
Parallel with the increasing number of coronary stent implantation procedures, new or more elaborate coronary stents were introduced into clinical use almost every month in 1996.
We have studied the architecture, surface-morphology, and shape-conversion of 16 different coronary stent systems.
The objective of our study was to detect possible specific design and surface features which might influence the healing process, instent restenosis, and stent thrombosis.
Using electron microscopy we found ultrasmooth surfaces on 5 stents.
All other coronary stents revealed individually varying and partly sharp-edged surface irregularities.
Video-based morphometry showed covering between 8.3% and 26.4%.
Stent shortening after in-vitro expansion ranged from 0% up to 10.5% of the initial stent length.
In some stent systems balloon dilation lead to over-expansion of the stent margaine.
This over-expansion mounted up to 20% of the balloon diameter and the stents revealed a rather biconcave than homogenous expansion pattern.
This phenomenon was also found after postmortal stent implantation in 20 autopsied hearts.
Unilateral hearing loss (HL) caused by an acoustic neuroma (AN) is regarded to be neural ("non-cochlear").
By using otoacoustic emissions it is possible to prove concurrent sensory (cochlear) HL.
We prefer distortion-product otoacoustic emissions (DPOAE) because these are more frequency-specific and stable.
From April 1994 to May 1996, we examined preoperatively 24 patients with radiologically proven AN.
Pure-tone audiometry, DP-grams, brainstem-evoked response audiometry (BERA) and vestibular studies were performed in all cases, while special auditory tests (Fowler, Carhart) and short increment sensitivity indices were also performed in 12 cases.
BERA was pathological in 23 cases and latencies were borderline in one case.
After comparing audiograms and DP-grams we found 13 patients with sensory HL, 4 patients with combined sensorineural HL and 7 patients with neural HL.
There was a strong correlation between the results of DPOAE and the results of special auditory test (=0.63) whereas there was no correlation between tumor size and cochlear function.
The result showed that the typical HL caused by AN was a combined sensorineural loss.
DPOAE were not suited for the detection of AN but were able to give exact information about any remaining cochlear function.
The monoclonal dominant malignant T cells in mycosis fungoides (MF) carry identical TCR rearrangements.
Their detection is a useful diagnostic tool.
Thus, in routine diagnosis we investigated the occurrence of monoclonal T cells in skin biopsy samples of MF-patients by TCR-PCR, followed by temperature gradient gel electrophoresis (TGGE).
In 188 out of 208 MF patients, at least one skin sample with sufficient DNA quality for PCR analysis was obtained.
Applying a consensus PCR for the TCR genes VI and J 1/2, we detected monoclonal T cells in 122 cases (65%).
In the remaining 66 cases, we performed two multiplex-PCRs, covering rearrangements of the other TCR genes.
Here we found in 11 cases (6%) predominant clonal rearrangements of VII-IV and J 1/2 and in 2 (1%) those of VI-IV and J P1/2.
In patients with MF, detecting rearrangements of only VI and J 1/2 is sufficient for PCR screening analysis.
In 53 of the patients (28%) the applied methods revealed no monoclonal T cells.
This may be due to a low cell number, oligoclonal nature, chromosomal abberations or remaining of TCR in germline configuration.
Despite significant improvements in early detection of hearing losses in children, a relatively long interval still exists from initial concern by families to definite audiological identification.
The aim of our retrospective cross-sectional study was to identify parental factors contributing to the delay of early detection.
The parents of 70 hearing-impaired children were interviewed.
All children were fitted with hearing aids in our clinical and had no additional physical or cognitive disabilities.
At an average age of 19.5 months, parents or family doctors noticed first signs of a possible hearing impairment.
On average it then took an additional 7.2 months until hearing impairment was diagnosed by an expert and the necessary first steps taken for rehabilitation (fitting of hearing aids).
Significantly, total hearing loss or profound hearing impairments were detected earlier than mild or moderate hearing impairments.
In addition to hearing loss, parental education correlated significantly with an earlier start of rehabilitation.
Statistical analysis revealed that children with hearing-impaired close relatives as well as first-born children tended to be diagnosed later.
To further improve secondary prevention of hearing loss, the competence of specific parental groups should be taken into consideration.
After the incidental puncture of a sidebranch of the thyreocervical trunk during a subclavian vein catheterization, a symptomatic av-fistula developped.
The diagnosis was confirmed by angiography.
Using a microcatheter system the fistula was occluded with microcoils.
This prospective study was designed to compare quality of life, life satisfaction, and subjective ratings of health before and at variable time intervals after heart transplantation (HTx).
175 patients were included between February 1994 and December 1997.
Every six months before and 1,5, 3, 6, and 12 months after HTx, they received the following standardized and validated questionnaires: German SF 36, heart failure and specific transplant symptom list, global quality of life assessment, Munich life quality dimension list, expected/experienced life changes after HTx, good command of the German language, and a minimum age of 18 years.
During data evaluation, median (Me), mean (M), and standard deviation (SD) were created from individual parameters.
Quality of life was rated as very poor by 84% of patients with congestive heart failure.
Only 6 weeks after HTx, 74% rated their quality of life as significantly better.
Before HTx 80% were very unsatisfied about their health status and 87% about physical performance.
Six weeks after HTx, this parameter improved significantly and 76% were very satisfied about their health status and 50% about physical performance.
While somatic changes expected before HTx corresponded well with experienced ones, psychological improvements were smaller than expected, but one year after HTx they were significant (before: M=3.66; SD=0.9; Range (R)=3.78 vs 12 months postop: M=4.61; SD=0.6; R=2.67; p<0.05).
Quality of life correlated before HTx best with subjectively rated health (r=0.61, p<0.01) and 6 months after with satisfaction about health status (r=0.76, p<0.01).
Only in 25% were expected improvements fulfilled regarding sexual activity/satisfaction, professional situation, and recreational activities.
90% of posttransplant patients reported physical compaints, most by effects of immunsuppression, but were coping well.
The study shows that already 6 weeks after successful HTx all quality of life parameters improved significantly.
Despite some unfulfilled expectations and complaints, the postoperative life situation of HTx patients appeared significantly improved.
Sevoflurane is a "new" volatile inhaled anaesthetic.
Owing to its lower blood-gas solubility coefficient, emergence from anaesthesia is faster with sevoflurane than with isoflurane, enflurane, or halothane.
Sevoflurane undergoes metabolic biodegradation, releasing inorganic fluoride ions that could produce nephrotoxicity.
In this study, we compared serum inorganic fluoride concentrations (IFCs) in patients receiving either sevoflurane or enflurane.
Furthermore, indices of renal function were evaluated until the 3rd postoperative day.
Background: Rarely, an additional Brown's syndrome develops spontaneously in cases of posttraumatic bilateral superior oblique palsy.
Surgical measures are controversial and problematic.
Metastasis formation is a multistep process that requires tumor cells to progress through many different stages.
One of the first steps is a disturbance of the epithelial integrity through a decrease in intercellular homotypic adhesion.
Proteolysis of the extracellular matrix, as well as increased locomotion, leads to intravasation and dissemination of the tumor cells.
In the target organs metastasizing cells adhere to the endothelium, extravasate and form metastases.
Finally, neoangiogenesis is required for the initiation as well as the growth of the metastases, providing the tumor cells with both nutritive agents and growth factors.
This leads to the conclusion that anti-proteolytic and anti-angiogenic substances could provide effective therapeutic approaches for the control of metastatic growth.
Whether or not this goal can be accomplished by synthetic or endogenous drugs must still be demonstrated by basic and definitive clinical research.
Purpose: The purpose of this study was to present our experience and results with arthroscopic resection of the acromioclavicular joint.
Urodynamic examinations were performed in 82 patients with clinically localized prostate cancer before and after radical prostatectomy.
A significant decrease in bladder capacity (396 ml to 331.9 ml), urethral closure pressure (89.6 cm H2O to 65.,2 cm H2O) and functional profile length (61 mm to 25.9 mm) was noted.
The continence rate after radical prostatectomy was 33.4 % after 1 month, 69.4 % after 3 months, 84.7 % after 6 months, and 90.9 % after 12 months, respectively.
A correlation was found between urethral closure pressure and functional profile length and continence.
A second urodynamic examination was performed 6 months after radical prostatectomy.
Functional profile length and urethral closure pressure increased.
These data suggest that restoration of continence is based on sphincteric parameters.
We are interested in the interaction of high-energy ultrasound with biological tissue with regard to cancer therapy.
The physical and biological aspects of this are reviewed and summarized in this paper.
The preliminary results give reason to hope, as ultrasound is easy to focuse and might be applicable as a supplementary therapeutic technique in ultrasound-accessible tumors.
The changes observed in biological studies are clearly a function of the pyhsical parameters.
Therefore, it is possible to calculate and predict the biological effects.
Recent results have shown the potential of magnetic resonance imaging in monitoring ultrasound therapy online.
The capability of MRI to measure temperature will be an important tool for the safe and reliable application of this new therapeutic approach.
The role of ultrasound therapy in the management of human tumors must be clarified in carefully conducted clinical trials.
Posttraumatic deformities after pediatric fractures are either the result of incomplete or failed remodeling, complete or partial stimulation of the growth plates, or complete or partial closure of a growth plate.
In contrast to fractures of the upper extremities, spontaneous remodeling should not be intentionally integrated in the treatment algorithm.
In the context of the quality assurance program of the German pension insurance institutions, instruments and procedures have been developed in the past few years in order to assess the quality of structure, process, and results of inpatient rehabilitation, as well as patient satisfaction.
The routine implementation of these procedures aims at providing rehabilitation hospitals with fast information on shortcomings in their current practice, so that concepts of treatment and - in the long run - effects of rehabilitation can be systematically improved.
When the "quality profiles" of rehabilitation hospitals are compared ("benchmarking"), paying institutions of rehabilitation could gain information on the cost-quality-ratio of particular hospitals as well as important leads for improving the steering processes of patients and hospitals.
In the present article, results of a first "field-run" of the procedures for measuring patient satisfaction and quality of rehabilitation processes are reported.
A comparative analysis of patient satisfaction in four orthopaedic/rheumatologic rehabilitation hospitals showed high degrees of overall satisfaction in all hospitals.
In several subdimensions of patient satisfaction, however, significant differences between hospitals were found.
Quality of rehabilitation processes - as assessed by a standardized peer-review - varied substantially between 36 hospitals.
Problems of quality were found especially in some dimensions that must be considered as crucial for rehabilitation, e.g., in the history and diagnosis of disabilities, in the consideration of psycho-social problems, or in the assessment of occupational capacities.
The analysis of THR-failures showed that the acetabular component still is the main problem of total hip replacement.
The acetabular cup fails more often than the stem.
In the midterm analysis the failure rate is a little bit higher in cementless than in cement fixed cups.
The known effect that the failure rate of cups fixed with cement increases exponentially 8 to 10 years after implantation, could of course not be seen in this study.
The success of the cementless fixation was negatively influenced by the diagnosis rheumatoid arthritis, age over 70 and the fixation manner: the failure rate of threaded cups was higher than the one of pressfit cups although the Zweymüller-cup as well as the Link type V-cup showed good results.
The midterm results of the stem were very good for the cementless as for the cemented technique.
Some implants showed compared to others significantly worse results.
The further implantation should be thought of, what partially has already happened.
The results of cementless stem fixation in patients with rheumatoid arthritis, osteoarthrosis and dysplastic osteoarthritis is comparable, so that cementless fixation should be thought of in case of adequate conditions (ability of partial weight bearing for some weeks, age under 60).
Type I and type II diabetes are the most common types of diabetes.
The ratio of type I to type II diabetes is about 1:9.
Type I diabetes is caused by an absolute insulin deficiency and is therefore referred to as insulin-dependent diabetes.The disease becomes manifest clinically in childhood or adolescence ("juvenile diabetes"), although manifestation in adulthood is being increasingly observed.
Morphologically, a subtotal ( > 80 %) to total loss of beta cells in the pancreatic islets occurs.
Lymphocytic insulitis, which disappears after the beta cells have been totally destroyed, is pathognomonic of type I diabetes.
This insulitis is an expression of an autoimmune event that is triggered by a multitude of factors.
An important factor appears to be a genetic predisposition (HLA DR3/DR4/DQ8) in connection with as yet unknown environmental factors (e. g., viruses).
Autoantibodies, such as islet cell cytoplasmic antibodies (ICA), insulin autoantibodies (IAA), and/or autoantibodies to the GABA-synthesizing enzyme glutamic acid carboxylase (GAD), are already detectable in a prediabetic phase, although it is not possible to predict the time of clinical manifestion.
The course of the disease is dependent on age.
Young children require insulin therapy sooner than juveniles or adults.
This article summarizes data from recent studies on the prevalence, diagnosis and therapy of the obstructive sleep apnea syndrome (OSAS) in children.
The prevalence of this disorder in 4-6 year old children is 0.7%.
Leading clinical sign in 90% of patients is habitual snoring, but this is rather nonspecific, as 60% of patients investigated for habitual snoring do not have OSAS.
Other signs such as daytime sleepiness, failure to thrive, profuse nocturnal sweating or mouth breathing are equally nonspecific.
The diagnosis, therefore, has to be confirmed by polysomnography, where OSAS is suggested by the occurrence of >5 obstructive apneas/hypopneas per hour of sleep in conjunction with a CO2 of >50 mmHg for >8% of sleep time and/or >1 desaturation to <=90%/h.
Patients with progressive cancer and their families face a series of existential crises with each stage of disease up to terminal stages in which palliative treatment is begun, and patients come to accept the inevitability of death.
This can lead to a unique, highly emotional situation with direct or indirect, open or hidden, varied and very personal manifestations.
The dermatological clinic in Homburg was founded in 1945.
In 1947 it was integrated into the Saarland University as a dermatology department.
A review of the history of the clinic documents advances and challenges in clinical dermatology, as well as new developments in related basic research during the last 50 years.
The coexistence of carotid artery stenosis with coronary artery disease occurs in a small percentage of patients requiring open heart surgical procedures.
Whether the combined surgical approach favorably influences the outcome of patients requiring major cardiac operations remains controversial.
We report the successful thrombectomy of the internal carotid artery.
A 33-year-old woman suffered from ovarian hyperstimulation syndrome after treatment with FSH/HCG for in-vitro fertilization.
She developed a transient left hemiparesis.
This was caused by a floating thrombus located in the internal carotid artery.
Open surgical treatment with thrombectomy prevents recurrent neurological symptoms.
The development of hand eczema is a relatively commonly seem dermatosis in housewives.
In 1986 we presented a first survey of potential contact dermatitis sources for a housewife.
Now, we present an update in which we analyse the different contact sources in the household and grade them in comparison to the data of 1986.
The results are based on the analysis of a large population of 2633 patients with the occupation "housewife" and the diagnosis "eczema" who have been seen in departments of dermatology belonging to the Information Network of Departments of Dermatology (IVDK).
Data for HIV infection on transmission probabilities per contact are of widely differing quality.
Estimates of infection probabilities after sexual exposures are the most problematic, even though sexual exposure is the most frequent transmission risk.
Extrapolations of data from discordant couple cohort studies and from US seroincidence studies may be seriously biased.
Infectivity of and susceptibility to HIV may be influenced by concomitant STDs, antiretroviral therapy, alloimmunization and/or subinfectious virus exposures and thus may show a wide range of inter- and intraindividual variability.
Differences in factors influencing transmission probability of HIV most likely outweigh differences in sexual behaviour in explaining the differences in epidemic spread of HIV.
Between January 1989 and March 1997, 175 patients with traumatic shoulder dislocations were treated by conservative means (median age 41 years, 39 F, 136 M).
In 78 patients (17 F, 61 M) a clinical and radiological follow up (median 50 months, range 6-106) could be obtained.
Additionally, a diagnostic ultrasound was carried out in all patients.
The recurrence rate in the group younger than 30 years (G < 30; n = 35) was 86 %; in the group older than 30 years (G > 30; n = 43) it was 21 % (P < 0.05).
Persisting neurological deficits were found in 6 patients (8 %).
According to the Rowe score, 16 patients (46 %) of the G < 30 achieved excellent or good results, in the G > 30, 29 patients (67 %).
In 17 % of cases, a glenohumeral arthrosis was diagnosed be radiological means.
18 % had radiological signs of a previous fracture of the greater tuberosity.
Hill-Sachs lesions were identified in 19 % of cases.
Rotator cuff tears were diagnosed in 9 % by ultrasound.
No relationship between the duration of immobilization and the recurrence rate was found (P = 0.95).
The recurrence rate following primary shoulder dislocation depends primarily on the patients' age.
We analyzed quality assurance protocol records of 532 geriatric hospital patients in comparison to an administration database concerning data on "length of stay" information (LOS).
Doctors handwritten quality assurance protocol records corresponded in 74.25% of cases to administration data.
14.47% of cases were registered with different LOS; 11.28% of LOS information was missing.
The increasing amount of documentation tasks in German geriatric hospitals is discussed.
Conclusion: We assume that not only discrete well known information (admission and discharge dates, LOS) are contaminated by documentation failure but also data on functional status of geriatric patients which may have important influence on external data processing.
The majority of patients with symptomatic spondylolysis can be treated conservatively.
Only when symptoms persist in spite of conservative treatment surgery may be indicated.
In young patients, however, fusion of a mobile segment should be avoided, but a direct repair of the pars defect can be attempted.
This procedure allows complete healing and possibly avoids degeneration of the intervertebral disk.
For this purpose Morscher developed the hook screw, which connects the arch with the anterior articular process.
It allows compression of the defect without crossing the defect with the screw.
A follow-up study of the first 33 patients with a follow-up time of 3.5 years on average showed a good subjective result in 79 % of the patients.
In patients younger than 20 years of age, however, the result was good in 87.5 % of cases.
The reason for the better results in young patients is that in older patients the origin of the pain is often not the pars defect, but the degeneration of the intervertebral disk.
Direct repair of spondylolysis is therefore indicated when pain persists after 6 months of conservative treatment or there is a progressive olisthesis of not more than 10 mm.
After the end of growth an MRI study of the intervertebral discs should show whether there is degeneration or not.
Direct repair is indicated only in the absence of disc degeneration.
After the age of 25 years this procedure should not be carried out.
We are presenting a 47-year-old woman who was stung by jellyfish while bathing in the sea of Thailand.
Immediately after the injury she developed sharp pain and urticarial erythema of the skin of the knees accompanied by muscle cramps of the entire body.
After a few days a toxic contact dermatitis with edematous swelling and ulcerations developed, which did not respond to topical antibiotics or corticosteroids.
Three weeks later the patient presented with a disseminated urticarial eruption, which at first responded well to topical treatment and systemic corticosteroids.
Over the next few weeks, however, a relapse of the eruption and the ulcerations occurred.
Raised titres of IgG and IgM antibodies against different jellyfish from the Indian and Pacific Ocean were detected in the patient's serum by the enzyme-linked immunosorbent assay.
Antibodies against bees (class 1) and wasps (class 4) were found by the radioallergosorbent test.
The clinical features and the immunological findings led to the diagnosis of toxic and allergic contact dermatitis to jellyfish venom.
First aid and secondary treatment of jellyfish injuries are suggested.
The design of controlled clinical trials on prevention and therapy of arrhythmic events is a difficult task.
In particular in ICD trials, false estimations and omissions have occured that can compromise the interpretation of a trial.
Identification of crucial issues that should be regulated in a study protocol in order to minimize the risk of failure.
Evaluation of the weaknesses of completed antiarrhythmic trials.
Problems in the specification of indications and in the estimation of the effective sample size cannot be solved by the inclusion of mixed populations but require the establishment of development programs.
Further crucial points are the appropriate choice of control and the identical concomittant treatment and observation of the groups to be compared.
Technical mistakes as imprecise definitions, arbitrary decisions during the course or at termination of a trial, unclear responsibilities or an unscheduled flow of information can be avoided if these potential problems are anticipated in the trial protocol.
A prospective approach that anticipates problems at the time the study protocol is drafted is preferable to a reluctant reactive approach during the course of the trial.
Ultrasound is the primary imaging modality after kidney transplantation.
Its general availability and the absence of radiation exposure and discomfort for the patient also make it a suitable procedure for follow-up.
Simple B-mode sonography provides comprehensive information on the morphology of the renal transplant and surrounding structures, while color-coded duplex sonography (CCDS) additionally allows assessment of the anastomoses and organ perfusion.
More recent technical advances such as power Doppler ultrasound appear to improve in particular the assessment of peripheral circulation.
The possibilities and limitations of the various sonographic techniques in the evaluation of kidney transplants are discussed with special reference to the most important clinical aspects and some basic technical concepts.
Purpose: The first morphological changes in eyes with HIV infection are microvascular disease of the retina with cotton-wool spots and microaneurysms.
The study was performed to find out if evidence of disturbances of ocular microcirculation can be established by non-invasive methods.
The operative realignment of mechanical axis deviations (MAD) is necessary to prevent early joint degeneration and to reach normal load-bearing.
Modern types of external fixation systems allow an alignment of the mechanical axis to exact degrees.
Predominantly this are corrections of angular deformities.
In some cases the analysis of the MAD does not show any angular deformity, but a parallel staggering of the mechanical axis lines of a bone.
Such parallel staggering of the mechanical axis lines is defined as a translation deformity of the bone.
In combined deformities with angulation and translation the centre of deformity can be established proximal or distal out of the limit of the bone.
In translation deformities the realignment of the mechanical axis requires a parallel re-staggering made by a translation-osteotomy or by a counterangulated double osteotomy.
In complex deformities with angulation and translation, the translation requires a separate corrective planning.
By using external fixator systems to perform acute or progressive corrective osteotomies the position of the Axis of Correction of Angulation (ACA) in relation to the n-CORA of the deformity has to be considered.
If ACA position is not conform with the n-CORA position relevant geometric effects in relation of length and translation occur.
These geometric effects to corrective osteotomies can be calculated by using simple trigonometric formulas or graphical methods.
Possibilities to compensate translation and length effects are shown by using unilateral external fixator systems.
The employers' liability insurance association for victuallers and licensed victuallers has been controlling healing procedures with the aid of a computer program for several years.
The personal data of the injured patient and the precise diagnosis of the injury are used to prepare a forecast of the duration of the treatment and of the patient's inability to work.
The basis of this forecast is provided by tables integrated in the program, which have been elaborated by experts on trauma medicine and also constantly refined by them.
Meanwhile numerous insurance companies concerned with accidents and trauma have acquired the program and are intending to use it.
The objective is a national database on trauma medicine covering the whole of Germany.
It is intended that its evaluation will help to guarantee the quality of concomitant treatment of trauma victims and also yield some indications on how best to realize the networking of institutions concerned with acute treatment and rehabilitation.
Stroke and its consequences are under medical, sociologic and socioeconomic aspects one of the biggest contemporary challenges.
Due to the demographic development the importance of this disease will further increase.
Nonetheless acute therapy of ischemic stroke up to now was marked by therapeutic nihilism and adherence to empiric therapeutic procedures.
Only the admission of rt-Pa in the USA in 1996 for the systemic thrombolysis in ischemic insults less then 3 hours old led to a change in therapeutic strategies.
The good profit-risk-ratio of early thrombolysis with rt-Pa could be confirmed by further studies lately.
In the meantime this therapy was officially recommended by the AHA in the importance of grade A recommendation.
In Europe thrombolysis is equally promoted as the procedure of choice.
At present only few patients receive such a treatment.
A thrombolytic therapy can only be provided by a minority of centers due to high requirement in infra-structure.
Furthermore clinic admission often appears with immense loss of time.
Unfortunately also within the clinics there are relevant latencies until therapeutic intervention.
Therefore fundamental requirements for thrombolytic therapy are the indentification of potentially suitable patients and the rapid transfer to an appropriate clinic.
A 69-year-old patient with reduced pulmonary function was diagnosed as suffering from non-small cell lung cancer of the left lung invading the main bronchus, pulmonary artery and left atrium.
Using cardiopulmonary bypass, an extended pneumonectomy with partial resection of the left atrium was performed.
The cardiac defect was closed with a pericardial patch.
The lower lobe was divided ex situ from the upper lobe and reimplanted with anastomosis of the lower pulmonary vein to the left auricle.
After a totally uneventful course the patient is in good condition and free of tumor recurrence 2.5 years postoperatively.
In this retrospective study we report the indications, complications and functional and cosmetic results after dermofat grafting into anophthalmic orbits.
The method consists of implantation of autogenous dermis with attached subcutaneous fat from the gluteal region into the orbit.
Twenty-four primary and 4 secondary grafts were implanted in 28 patients aged 12 to 49 years.
In the explantation site one patient showed delayed healing.
All implants became integrated, none were lost because of infection or extrusion.
Eleven patients developed minor complications like central ulceration in the dermis, hair growth on the dermis or suture granuloma.
In the primary implant group the functional and cosmetic outcome was evaluated by measurements of the lid structures, exophthalmometry (Hertel) and measuring the prosthesis motility (Kestenbaum).
Three patients showed fair results; all the others had good or very good results.
In one case of a secondary implant marked graft atrophy was observed.
Despite the more extensive surgery and some minor complications the safety of this method with good functional and cosmetic results makes dermofat grafting an excellent alternative to heterogenous orbital implants.
Liver tissue from 14 female patients with primary biliary cirrhosis (PBC; stages I-IV) was systematically investigated for the prevalence and distribution of dendritic antigen-presenting cells.
Dendritic cells (DCs) were immunhistochemically identified by use of anti-S 100 protein and KiMlp antibodies.
We confirm previous findings that, in early PBC, S 100 protein-positive DCs can be detected within the lining of bile duct epithelia.
However, the present study disclosed that S 100 protein- and KiMlp-positive DCs regularly occur in piecemeal necroses (PMNs) developing in PBC-associated chronic hepatitis.
DCs in PMNs were observed in all PBC stages, but were most prominent in late-stage PBC.
These findings suggest that autoimmune tissue damage in PBC may not be limited to bile ducts, but may also ensue in hepatic parenchyma, producing the pattern of chronic hepatitis with signs of activity.
Health care in emergencies is a social good and a hallmark of a humane society, the ethical foundations of which have to form the basis of all decisions regarding medical emergencies.
The ethics of emergency medical care are part of general medical ethics.
Their principles are outlined and put into perspective with regard to dilemmas characteristic of emergency care.
Due to dwindling resources, the efficiency of emergency medical care is being increasingly scrutinized.
Possibilities of rationalizing care without compromising its quality are being discussed, such as renouncing futile therapy and implementing measures of prevention.
If emergency medical services are to accomplish their mission, however, observing standards of medical practice, legal provisions, and the given framework of society, they must not surrender to pure cost containment.
We performed a phase II trial with second-line chemotherapy in patients with refractory, metastatic cancer of the bladder.
Second-line therapy consists of 2.6 cycles of mitomycin-C, 5-fluorouracil and folic acid.
Two patients suffered from WHO grade III side effects (nephrotoxicity, leukocytopenia).
We did not find any complete or partial remission.
Four patients had a stable disease; 3.3 months after therapy, patients developed tumor progression with a median survival of 9 months.
Four patients reported an improvement in quality of life.
Since all patients received supportive care, improvement in quality of life cannot be related to chemotherapy alone.
In conclusion, second-line chemotherapy with mitomycin-C, 5-fluorouracil and folic acid has no effect on refractory, metastatic cancer of the bladder and is no alternative for cisplatin and methotrexate-based chemotherapy.
Every form of active euthanasia is a punishable offence under § 216 of the Penal Code; nor is there any ethical justification for it from a medical point of view.
The many strands of the movement in favour of making "death on demand" exempt from punishment in Germany as it is in The Netherlands cannot change this.
The oral retinoid etretinate (Tigason) has recently been replaced by trans-acitretin (Neotigason) in the treatment of severe psoriasis, primarily because of its short half-life and the assumption that a shorter period of subsequent contraception would be required.
After introduction of the new drug, however, circulating quantities of etretinate were detected in patients treated with trans-acitretin.
Thus far, re-esterification has been detected in at least 83 cases.
The 2-month period of strict contraception initially recommended after oral intake of trans-acitretin has been extended to 2 years, as with etretinate.
We review some aspects of trans-acitretin metabolism, with special emphasis on etretinate formation.
Re-esterification of trans-acitretin into etretinate takes place under varying conditions in volunteers and patients, as well as in animal models.
Ethanol is a co-factor for the enzymatic re-esterification of trans-acitretin.
It is unclear whether the introduction of trans-acitretin has been of any significant benefit to patients.
Monitoring of plasma retinoid levels during and after retinoid therapy remains of decisive importance in managing difficult cases and or in approving decisions for pregnancy.
The purpose of this study was to compare the midterm results of the conservative treatment of anterior cruciate ligament (ACL) ruptures in athletes.
During 1989 and 1990, 279 athletes with ACL ruptures were treated in our Sports Surgery Department, and 221 of them were suitable for inclusion in the study.
The patients were divided into two groups based on management after the diagnosis of ACL rupture had been  made.
Group I (n = 129) underwent ACL reconstruction using free bone-patellar tendon-bone autografts, while group II (n = 92) received conservative treatment.
We were able to evaluate 92 patients during follow-up (42 from group I and 50 from group II).
The average follow-up period was 86 months.
There were no significant differences between the two groups regarding the patients' age, sex, or level of sports activity.
Follow-up consisted of clinical and radiological examinations and recording of the subjective opinions of the patients.
During follow-up, we used IKDC and OAK scores to evaluate the results.
We found significantly better results in the group that was operated on if the patients took part in high-risk pivoting sports, but there was no difference if the patients were in the low-risk or no-risk pivoting group of athletes.
Concerning reoperation and early arthrosis, the difference was significant between the two groups.
Background: By depletion of stratospheric ozone, enhanced levels of UV radiation reach the surface of the earth.
Exposure of the anterior parts of the eye to UV radiation leads to irritation of the conjunctival and corneal cells.
The aim of this study was to evaluate the reliability of a low field strength MRI unit (0.2 T; Esaote, Biomedica) and a high field strength MRI unit (1.5 T; Siemens) in detecting meniscal lesions.
Twenty patients were investigated on a 0.2-T low-field MRI unit and a 1.5-T high-field MRI unit for meniscal lesions.
Evaluation was performed of four meniscal compartments (anterior and posterior medial and lateral meniscus), for a total of 80 observations.
The reliability of diagnosis was ranked qualitatively on a three-point scale.
Investigations of the high-field MRI unit revealed a meniscal tear in 6 patients and ruled out a tear in 14 patients.
Evaluation of individual meniscal compartments revealed diagnosis with high confidence in 58 observations and with moderate confidence in 22 observations.
Investigations of the low-field MRI unit revealed a meniscal tear in 5 patients and ruled out tears in 15 patients.
Evaluation of individual meniscal compartments revealed diagnosis with high confidence in 39 observations, with moderate confidence in 38 observations, and with low confidence in 3 observations.
The diagnosis in high- and low-field images was identical in 98.7 % of cases; in one patient observations from the high-field unit changed the therapeutic management.
Diagnostic reliability was significantly higher with highfield strength MR imaging.
Low field strength MR imaging shows comparatively high diagnostic accuracy for meniscal lesions compared to high field strength imaging; however, we demonstrated a significantly higher confidence in diagnosis with high-field MR imaging.
The past decade has seen the successful application of genetic techniques in the dissection of the most important phenotypes of cancer cells.
In the case of drug resistance mechanisms, the elucidation of the genes involved in resistance to anticancer agents has led to new and unexpected information about tumor physiology and may well open therapeutic options by virtue of reversing clinical chemoresistance.
The experimental characterization of defined multidrug resistance factors, such as P-glycoprotein, multidrug resistance associated protein, topoisomerase, or glutathione-S-transferase in urologic malignancies, is now relatively comprehensive, allowing for an initial analysis.
Clinical studies on some of these concepts have been started and will be the subject of careful scrutinity.
We expect that they will have a considerable impact on the way certain urologic anticancer strategies will be pursued in the future.
A study was carried out to determine the risk of dysesthesia of the inferior alveolar and of the lingual nerve after molar surgery.
A total of 1103 impacted lower wisdom teeth and 3 impacted lower second molars were removed in 687 patients, all of whom with unaltered sensibility preoperatively.
Clinical, radiological, and surgical factors of each case were recorded.
Postoperative disturbances in the sensibility of the lip and tongue were evaluated by neurological examination.
Follow-up was carried out for a maximum of 35 weeks.
Dysesthesia of the inferior alveolar nerve occurred with an incidence of 3.57%.
The lingual nerve was injured in 2.1% of patients.
Most of the initially reported alterations in sensation resolved within the follow-up period.
Dysesthesia of the inferior alveolar nerve persisted in 0.91%, and of the lingual nerve in 0.37%.
However, the extent of the prolonged impairment was slight in general.
The effect of the documented factors on the incidence of dysesthesia was analyzed.
For the inferior alveolar nerve, analysis revealed significant effects in older patients, for completely developed roots, for deeply impacted teeth, in the radiological relationship of the roots and the inferior alveolar canal, for difficult surgery, and for intraoperative exposure of the nerve.
The surgeon and the anesthesia had a significant influence on lingual dysesthesia.
Background: This review of radiological and other procedures used in the diagnosis of (chronic) low-back pain is not intended to provide a complete evaluation of the methods employed, because the validity, specificity and sensitivity of the various diagnostic measures are the subject of so much controversy that a comprehensive discussion would be beyond the scope of the present overview.
The choice of method depends not only on the clinical symptoms but also on the localisation of the pain, the aetiology of which may also be related to the age of the patient.
Enteritis and pseudoappendicitis are typical manifestations of Yersinia infections in children.
This is a report on a child with localised tumourous mesenteric lymphadenitis due to Yersinia enterocolitica persistent for a long time.
We found specific antibodies against Yersinia outer membrane proteins repeat-edly in the patients' serum.
Only after a ciprofloxacin therapy for 16 weeks we observed a recovery of our patient.
The present study investigates patients' expectations toward radiotherapy and their associations to quality of life and physician judgements.
Fifty-five patients with tumors of different sites (30 with previous tumor-related surgery, 25 without surgery) admitted to the department of radiotherapy filled out a standardized questionnaire (EORTC QLQ-C30, PLC by Siegrist et al., therapy-related expectations and success) before and after inpatient radiotherapy.
The corresponding physician ratings were collected.
Fifty-eight percent of the patients expected the therapeutic goal "healing", whereas from the physician's standpoint this was realistic in only 7 % of cases.
The specific radiotherapy-related expectations "tumor control" and "pain relief" reached almost the same levels in patients and physician (71 % vs 71 % and 40 % vs 44 %).
Patients with healing expectancy reported higher quality of life at the beginning of the therapy (53.4 % vs 39.9 %); patients expecting pain relief reported lower quality of life (37.1 % vs 54.5 %).
Surgical patients who had been operated on within the past year (n = 18) showed a particularly high healing expectancy (83 %), whereas patients whose operation dated back more than 1 year focused on pain relief as therapeutic goal (83 %).
The surgeon, as the primary contact person for patients, can influence patients' therapy-related expectations.
In explaining the overall therapeutic strategy, surgeons should also mention the scope and limits of adjuvant therapies.
The meanings of the terms "quality", "quality of care", and "quality management" were clarified with common international definitions.
Based on that, the basic ideas, concepts, and objectives of quality management in medicine were explained.
Finally some future trends related to quality were viewed, which represent challenges for the medical profession and entire medicine.
The papular-purpuric "gloves and socks" syndrome (PPGSS) was first described in 1990 by Harms et al.
The syndrome is characterised by fever, an itchy erythema with edema, confluent papules and purpura of the hands and feet in a "gloves and socks" distribution.
The skin lesions may be associated with purpura and superficial erosions of the oral mucosa.
Viral infections, in particular parvovirus B19, are the most likely trigger.
In the present case PPGSS developed after taking trimethoprim/sulfamethoxazole.
Since the patient developed identical symptoms after accidental re-challenge with the same drug, this case strongly suggests medications as another factor in the pathogenesis of PPGSS.
Most fractures of the clavicle heal well with nonoperative treatment.
On rare occasions, malunited clavicular fractures are associated with a pattern of disability that includes not only pain but also functional or neurovascular impairment.
In these cases, clavicular osteotomy and correction of the deformity should be considered.
In four patients with a malunited fracture of the clavicle following nonoperative treatment, we performed a clavicular osteotomy for deformity.
In all four patients the clavicular fracture healed with shortening associated with pain and ipsilateral glenohumeral dysfunction.
The deformity was not associated with neurovascular dysfunction.
In preoperative X-ray studies, the shortening of the malunited clavicle was between 0.9 and 2.2 cm in comparison to the contralateral clavicle.
All patients underwent an extension osteotomy of the clavicle with interposition of an autogenous iliac crest bone graft.
The follow-up was 1 - 4 years postoperatively.
The functional outcome was evaluated using the Constant-Murley and the UCLA score.
All patients had immediate pain relief following osteotomy and correction of the deformity.
The shoulder function rapidly improved, and the functional outcome was good in three out of the four patients.
If there is associated functional impairment in malunited clavicular fractures, extension osteotomy combined with autogenous bone grafting may produce predictably good results.
As the importance of laparoscopic surgery for benign diseases of the gastrointestinal tract continues to grow, the application of this approach in cases of malignancy remains controversial.
Although the concept of cancer recurrence in the area of surgical wounds is not new, the incidence of port site recurrence is the most obvious concern.
Indications and contraindications for surgery as well as a standardized nomenclature describing the type of laparoscopic procedures being performed are some other issues that need to be clarified.
Complete laparoscopic procedures or the combination of laparoscopy with open techniques can offer advantages and disadvantages that surgeons will have to take into consideration when making decisions.
The skill of the operating team and the extent of disease define the boundaries of laparoscopic surgery possible.
The continued research as well as development of intelligent instruments and standardized techniques might give laparoscopy a clear role in the treatment of abdominal malignancies.
Background: The mechanical stabilization of the cornea in keratoconus may delay progression of this disease.
The cross-linking techniques optimized in corneas of enucleated porcine eyes were investigated under in vivo conditions in rabbits to estimate the biocompatibility and duration of the stiffening effect.
In the biopsy material of a polypoid intrabronchial lesion of a 54-year-old male patient with radiologically established lung tumor, spindle-cell neoplasia was seen.
No clear histogenetic classification of the submucous tumor process was possible.
After resection of the right upper lobe of the lung, including the results of additional immunohistochemical analyses, the tumor was classified as biphasic synovial sarcoma.
This was suggested mostly by immunohistochemical detection of the epithelial membrane antigene (EMA) and of vimentin.
Extensive clinical examinations ruled out the possibility of a primary tumor with extrapulmonary localization.
This case report shows the problems faced in correctly classifying the histogenesis or the direction of differentiation in extremely rare cases of primary pulmonary synovial sarcoma.
Especially in small biopsy samples showing a submucous spindle-cell tumor of the lung, apart from frequent sarcoma metastases, the presence of primary synovial sarcoma of the lung has to be considered in the differential diagnosis.
Necrotizing pancreatitis is still associated with considerable morbidity and mortality.
Formerly, surgical treatment with early and extensive pancreatic resection has been the standard.
Improvements in our understanding of the pathogenesis of the disease and progress in the field of intensive care therapy have made conservative therapy the initial standard in the treatment of necrotizing pancreatitis.
A considerable percentage of patients with sterile necrosis can be managed with low morbidity and mortality by conservative treatment without operation.
Nevertheless, surgical treatment is indicated in patients with infected necrosis and in sterile necrosis if multiorgan failure persists over a limited period of time despite maximum intensive care therapy.
Pancreatic resection should be abandoned for surgical treatment of pancreatic necrosis, as results with regard to morbidity, mortality and long-term outcome are unsatisfactory.
Today the surgical standard is careful digital necrosectomy, which must be followed by either postoperatve drainage, repeated open lavage or continuous closed lavage.
In experienced hands, all three procedures provide similar results with regard to morbidity and mortality.
The aim of quality management in rheumatology is to improve care and outcome in patients with rheumatic diseases.
This can be achieved by means of prospective long-term observation of the patient with regular documentation of clinical, radiological, biochemical and functional data using certain validated scoring methods (DAS, radiological score, ADL score Hanover or Health assessment questionnaire, SF36, etc.).
Long-term observation and documentation including radiographs have been performed in the rheumatology hospital in Ratingen for 20 years without even knowing the term quality management.
Quality management in a hospital for rheumatic diseases begins with certain structural prerequisites: possibility of direct admission of a patient to the hospital by the family physician, outpatient clinic to investigate and to follow patients over a long period of time, multidisciplinary team with specialists in rheumatology, orthopedic surgery, physiotherapy, ergotherapy, special care, psychological, and social services, close cooperation with specialists in neurology, dermatology, ophthalmology, etc., department of radiology, special laboratory, facilities for internal diagnostics and treatment.
The hospital needs a training program for the qualification of rheumatologists and orthopaedic surgeons.
The hospital staff should closely cooperate with the doctors in private practice who admit patients and should continously support patient organizations.
The quality of outcome is influenced by the process quality which depends on the following factors: selection, training and motivation of the hospital staff; supervision of clinical assessment and documentation by senior physicians, daily x-ray demonstrations and case reports, interdisciplinary case demonstrations at least every week in addition to daily consultation, team reports, regular education including review of actual literature for physicians, education programs exchanging knowledge with physiotherapists and nurses, and regular education programs for patients.
Process quality can only be achieved by an interdisciplinary approach and regular communication between all participants including the patient, whose opinion must be noted and regarded.
As far as possible, the same doctor who treats the patient in the hospital should follow her/him in the outpatient clinic.
The quality of outcome can be improved by regular reinvestigation of the patient with control of medication, side effects, efficacy, documentation of clinical, biochemical, radiological, and functional data.
Decisions for further treatment have to be based on these follow-up data.
A standardized follow up and documentation system for all rheumatology units with prompt feedback could definitely improve the quality of rheumatologic care in Germany.
Two children on chemotherapy for acute myeloid leukemia (AML) and acute lymphoblastic leukemia (ALL) had initially focal, then generalized seizures of short duration.
Magnetic resonance imaging (MRI) revealed in one case minor parietal, cortical and subcortical increased signal on T2-weighted images.
In a second case extended supratentorial lesions and additional signal changes in the cerebellum were found.
Although chemotherapy was continued, a few days later signal changes were considerably reduced or had disappeared.
We consider these lesions to be seizure induced in a brain previously sensitized by chemotherapy.
Hydatid disease is caused by the parasitic tapeworm Echinococcus.
The larval stage of this parasite can thrive in many parts of the body, most frequently in the liver.
Primary bone location is very rare, accounting for less than 2 % of all hydatid lesions.
We report on a case of left-sided extended pelvic infestation.
The destruction of the hip joint, os pubis, large parts of the ileum and the femoral head made pelvic resection and prosthetic replacement necessary.
Recurrence of a hydatid cyst 5 years later in the left groin originating from the proximal femur was treated with second femoral resection and new total hip replacement.
Because of instability, the primarily inserted polyacetal pelvic replacement had to be exchanged for a custom-made device fabricated with the aid of computer-aided design (CAD) techniques.
This surgical procedure was combined with chemotherapy (mebendazole).
The necessity of radical resection in osseus hydatid disease is discussed.
At present, phosphodiesterase III inhibitors are commonly used for the treatment of low cardiac output states.
Despite their positive inotropic and lusitropic effects, these drugs are still under discussion because of certain adverse effects like thrombopaenia, elevation of transaminases, abdominal disregulation, and excessive periphereal vasodilatation.
As a consequence, more cardioselective phosphodiesterase inhibitors were developed with the aim of reducing these adverse effects.
One of them, enoximone (Marion Merrell Dow, Fig.
1), an imidazole derivative, has nearly no influence on platelets and abdominal organ function.
In addition, in many studies vasodilatation was found to be absent.
Recently a new substance, R80122 (Janssen, Belgium, Fig.
1), was developed.
First experimental studies showed high cardioselectivity of this substance.
The aim of this study was to compare the haemodynamic effects of enoximone and R80122 in patients with ischaemic heart disease.
The extremely rare finding of a proximal radio-ulnar synostosis in a 5 years-old girl with a fetal alcohol syndrome is presented.
Despite the elbow's being fixed at 30  ° pronation, the patient exhibits good ipsilateral arm function.
The difficulties in differential diagnosis and treatment modalities are discussed.
Ischemic preconditioning (IP), using one or more brief periods of ischemia before a sustained ische- mia, represents a new approach in reducing ischemia-induced skeletal muscle damage.
The aim of this study was to investigate the effect of IP on skeletal muscle function after 3 h ischemia and 2 h reperfusion in a rodent model.
IP protocols using one, two, or three preconditioning cycles of 10 min ischemia and 10 min reperfusion each, were compared to non-preconditioned controls.
IP was found to significantly improve force, performance, endurance, and contractility of postischemic skeletal muscle.
The efficacy of IP- induced protection was correlated with the number of preconditioning cycles.
Preconditioning with three cycles resulted in a more effective protection as compared to one or two cycles.
Altogether, this study describes the efficacy of IP in improving post-ischemic muscle function and the need of more than one IP cycle to achieve this improvement.
The respective clinical potential warrants further exploration.
Pachyonychia congenita (PC) is a rare ectodermal dysplasia with variable expression.
The condition is usually inherited as an autosomal dominant trait.
Several classifications of PC have been proposed.
Feinstein and colleagues suggested four clinical types of PC.
Type II, the Jackson-Lawler-Syndrome, is characterized by multiple epidermal cysts, palmoplantar bullae and hyperhidrosis as well as natal teeth in addition to the main findings of pachyonychia, palmoplantar hyperkeratosis and follicular keratosis.
We report two patients (father and son) with Jackson-Lawler-Syndrome and describe in detail pathogenesis, diagnostic criteria and treatment approaches as well as the different classifications of pachyonychia congenita.
Aim of this review article was to critically analyse the recently described zytogenetic and molecular markers for testicular germ cell tumors with regard to their clinical utility.
The isochromosome i(12p) represents the most common and characteristic cytogenetic finding which already appears in testicular carcinoma in situ.
A number of proto - oncogenes (Cyclin D and PTHLH) as well as putative tumor suppressor genes are localized on 12p; however, their role in pathogenesis and prognosis of testicular germ cell tumors has not been defined yet.
Clinical characteristics of patients with familial testicular germ cell tumors indicate a genetic background for the development of testicular tumors.
Although a number of chromsomal loci encoding potential testicular tumor susceptibility genes have been identified, the genetic basis of testicular cancer pathogenesis is still unknown.
With regard to molecular prognostic risk factors most of the reported data on proliferation markers, tumor suppressor genes, proteases and adhesion molecules have to be confirmed in prospective randomized trials prior to their widespread clinical use.
Based on the available data on prospective studies percentage of embryonal carcinoma and vascular invasion appear to be the most significant prognosticators.
Investigation and identification of those factors determining the aggressive biologic behavior of embryonal carcinoma compared to all other histological components appear to be most promising in research for prognosticators of metastatic disease.
After laparoscopic cholecystectomy, carbon dioxide (CO2) must be exhaled after resorption from the abdominal cavity.
There is controversy about the amount and relevance of postoperative CO2 resorption.
Without continuous postoperative monitoring, after laparoscopic cholecystectomy a certain risk may consist in unnoticed hypercapnia due to CO2 resorption.
Studies exist on the course of end-expiratory CO2 (PeCO2) alone over a longer postoperative period of time in extubated patients during spontaneous breathing.
The goal of this prospective study was to investigate the amount of CO2 resorbed from the abdominal cavity in the postoperative period by means of CO2 metabolism.
After giving informed consent to the study, which was approved by the local ethics committee, 20 patients underwent laparoscopic cholecystectomy.
All patients received general endotracheal anaesthesia.
After induction, total IV anaesthesia was maintained using fentanyl, propofol, and atracurium.
Patients were ventilated with oxygen in air (FiO2 0.4).
The intraabdominal pressure during the surgical procedure ranged from 12 to 14 mm Hg.
Thirty minutes after releasing the capnoperitoneum (KP), CO2 elimination (V.CO2), oxygen uptake (V.O2), and respiratory quotient (RQ) were measured every minute for 1 h by indirect calorimetry using the metabolic monitor Deltatrac according to the principle of Canopy.
Assuming an unchanged metabolism, the CO2 resorption (V.CO2) at any given time (t) can be calculated from V.CO2 (t)=V.CO2 (t)-RQ (preop) V.O2 (t).
It was thus necessary to define the patient's metabolism on the day of operation.
The first data were collected before surgery and after introduction of the arterial and venous cannulae for a 15-min period.
Measuring point 0 was determined after exsufflation of the KP and emptying of the remaining CO2 via manual compression by the surgeon at the end of surgery.
Patient's tracheas were extubated and metabolic monitoring started 30 min after release of the KP for 60 min.
Simultaneously, a nasal side-stream capnometry probe was placed and the PeCO2 and respiratory frequency (RF) were obtained by the Capnomac Ultima (Datex) and registered every minute as well.
Values were averaged over four periods of 15 min each.
An arterial blood gas sample was drawn at the end of every 15-min period.
Postoperative pain was scored by a visual analog scale and completed by a subjective index questionnaire on general well-being.
All data were analysed by the Friedman or Wilcoxon test; P<0.05 was considered significant.
The findings do not indicate CO2 resorption in the postoperative period after laparoscopic cholecystectomy (Tables 2 and 3, Fig.
Arterial CO2 as well as PeCO2 were elevated postoperatively (45 mm Hg vs. 36 mm Hg intraoperatively), while V.CO2 and V.O2 were unchanged when compared to the preoperative measuring period.
The postoperative RF was comparable to preoperative values.
Calculated CO2 was lower than 10 ml/min and within accuracy of measurements.
The postoperative pain index ranged between 3 and 4, and 3.75 - 15 mg piritramid was administered.
All patients feld tired immediately after the operation, but scores improved slightly at the end of the 60-min period of metabolic monitoring.
There is no significant resorption of CO2 from the abdominal cavity later than 30 min after releasing the KP.
Up to this time, any CO2 remaining in the abdominal cavity after careful emptying by the surgeon has been resorbed and exhaled.
The gene of the cyclin-dependent kinase 4 (CDK4)-inhibitor p16INK4A (CDKN2/MTS1) has been proposed as a candidate for a tumor-suppressor gene located on chromosome 9p21, a frequently deleted region in a series of human cancers including malignant melanoma.
An increasing and sometimes conflicting body of data has accumulated regarding the frequency of homozygous deletions and mutations as well as the importance of p16INK4A in malignant melanoma.
The purpose of this review is therefore to summarize the current knowledge on p16INK4A and to discuss its biologic significance in the pathogenesis of melanocytic tumors.
The prevalence of psychiatric symptoms and disorders in HIV-infected patients is high.
The differential diagnosis includes psychoreactive disorders, acute psychiatric symptoms of an HIV-associated encephalopathy, and symptomatic psychotic illnesses due to secondary neurologic manifestations such as opportunistic central nervous infections and intracerebral lymphoma.
Clinical aspects and psychopathological findings are not sufficient for differential diagnosis and identification of primarily psychiatric disorders.
Secondary neurologic manifestations causing a symptomatic psychosis must be excluded as soon as possible by brain imaging (CT, MRI) and analysis of the cerebrospinal fluid.
In emergency situations, however, German law imposes strict regulations, especially in the case of sectioned patients.
These medical and medicolegal questions are illustrated by case reports and propositions for an effective strategy are made.
In simultaneous bilateral nerve recordings, patients with Sympathetically Maintained Pain (SMP) affecting one limb show similar sympathetic traffic in nerves supplying the affected and unaffected limb, also when the painful limb shows a marked regional autonomic (vasomotor) dysfunction.
These findings argue against the notion that SMP must be mediated by a reflex change in the pattern of sympathetic discharge.
In general, they underline the fact that autonomic effector disturbances may give little information about underlying nerve traffic.
Intraoperative transluminal angioplasty (ITA) has considerably broadened the spectrum of vascular surgical reconstruction, fulfils the requirements of minimally invasive therapy and has thus experienced a rapid development within the past few years.
Whereas the indications and clinical results have been described adequately in the literature, reports on the procedural management of ITA are rare.
One of the basic prerequisites of this method is the correct and nontraumatic implantation of the vascular access sheath at the proper location.
In the following, the technique of ortho- and retrograde sheath implantation, either through the vessel itself or through a vascular graft, is described in detail.
By respecting particular standards for sheath introduction, ischaemia time and vessel wall injury during ITA can be kept to a minimum.
The importance of the chronology of vascular reconstruction to angioplasty is also elucidated.
In addition, the advantages and disadvantages of sheath implantation compared with direct vessel puncture are demonstrated.
In spite of new developments, including intraluminal fixation of the sheath with an expandable balloon, the "ideal" angioplasty access sheath is, as yet, not available.
In several cases of lupus erythematosus (SLE, SCLE, DLE), the Koebner phenomenon could be seen in the apparently normal skin of patients following traumas, scratching effects, operation scars, contact dermatitis, pressure from sock tops, application of liquid nitrogen, exposure to strong sun light, etc.
The interval between exposure to such provocation factors and appearance of the isomorphic reactions varied from case to case.
In SLE patients receiving systemic treatment with glucocorticosteroids, the Koebner phenomenon could not be found, while it was detected in patients with generalized DLE who had never received any systemic glucocorticoid hormones.
It was not seen in patients with localized DLE.
There was no direct relationship between the appearance of humoral autoantibodies and onset of the Koebner phenomenon.
With regard to the histopathogenesis of the Koebner phenomenon, it is thought that disturbances of the local cellular repair processes and of the cytokine network, with expression of adhesion molecules, might be involved.
The Koebner phenomenon may be a valuable model for the investigation of lupus erythematosus.
In 5 years 9 patients with a total of 16 painful ear nodules (chondrodermatitis helicis) have been treated as follows.
A small excision is carried out with local anaesthesia for histological examination.
The rest of the nodule or any other nodules are carbonized by means of the argon laser, also with local anaesthesia, including the surface of the cartilage under the nodules.
There have been no cases of postoperative inflammation or infection.
New nodules occurring several months after treatment have been successfully treated in the same way.
There have been no real recurrences.
The cosmetic result is very good in all cases.
The patients are free of pain immediately after the laser therapy.
Laser therapy for painful nodules of the ear has good and lasting results, with a lower rate of recurrences than any other form of treatment.
We represent and discuss etiology, diagnosis as well as differential diagnoses of tuberculous orchtitis referring to an actual case of this rare disease.
In the least of all cases one can conclude from the clinical symptoms on the tuberculous origin of the disease.
Other differential diagnoses will set more frequently due to rarity of this disease.
Quite a lot of cases a bacterial superinfection veils the sterile leucocyturia as main characteristic of genitourinary tuberculosis.
Imaging diagnostics frequently fails to give indications of tuberculous origin of the lesion.
As before the evidence of Mycobacteria tuberculosis is the most important parameter to proof a tuberculosis.
Despite required microbiological cultivation to make a resistogram the polymerase chain reaction is a high sensitive and comparable fast method for detection of Mycobacteria even from tissue.
In such dubious cases we recommend to perform an operative denudation due to frequently difficult delimitation from malignant testicular tumours.
In surgical procedures associated with high blood loss, such as vascular and cardiac operations, differential diagnosis and therapy of perioperative hemorrhage are of special importance.
Preoperative screening for patients at high risk of bleeding and in particular for those with qualitative platelet disorders [drug-induced platelet disorders (in particular ASS), von Willebrand's disease and other congenital platelet disorders] is effective in minimizing blood loss.
Bleeding in acute medical emergencies or during emergency operations may require treatment without specific investigations being performed in advance.
Therefore, simple schemes are essential for the rapid management of acute hemostatic problems.
The aim of this paper was to address the diagnostic and therapy of hemorrhagic diathesis focusing mainly on diagnosis and therapy of hemorrhagic diathesis due to blood platelet disorders and blood coagulation disorders and preoperative identification of patients at increased risk of bleeding.
Although deep vein thrombosis now has a better prognosis than in the era before anticoagulation, a number of patients remain in whom ulcus cruris cannot be adequately controlled by conservative treatment.
The case report of a 50-year-old woman with stage III chronic venous insufficiency associated with the post-thrombotic syndrome is presented.
Progress in imaging techniques and functional diagnostics of the post-thrombotic syndrome make a reliable differentiation of the chronic venous insufficiency possible with respect to obstruction or reflux.
If conservative treatment fails, autological valve transplantation is described as a suitable reconstructive management method in the treatment of reflux.
Following this report, the results and limitations of this method are discussed.
The neurobiological alterations commonly found in affective disorders (e.g., alterations in the nocturnal sleep profile, dysfunction of the hypothalamic-pituitary-adrenocortical system) gradually recover with improvement of the depressive syndrome.
Their persistence during full clinical remission, however, is associated with an increased risk for relapse and, thus may represent trait markers for affective disorders.
In order to test this hypothesis, we designed a prospective study in which healthy first-degree relatives (high-risk probands; HRPs; n=54) of patients with an affective disorder are investigated by means of polysomnography, the combined dexamethasone and corticotropine-releasing hormone (DEX-CRH) test and a variety of psychometric scales.
In the present part of the study (index assessment), these HRPs, as a group, showed depressionlike alterations in both the sleep pattern and the DEX-CRH-test outcome; furthermore, their psychometric profile was characterized by elevated scores on the scales assessing "rigidity" and "autonomic lability".
On a single-case level, 35% of the HRPs were identified as conspicuous (depressionlike) in at least two of the three areas investigated.
A decision of whether or not this "conspicuousness" indeed represents a trait marker for affective disorders can be reached when the follow-up part of the study has identified those HRPs with their respective premorbide status who have developed an affective disorder in the meantime.
Undifferentiated connective tissue disease with secondary antiphospholipid syndrome was diagnosed in a 33 year old woman after recurrent arterial thromboses, two miscarriages and myocarditis.
Despite effective immunosuppression and anticoagulation her initially mild precapillary pulmonary hypertension progressed in the absence of thromboembolic events, cardiopulmonary disease or other systemic disorders.
iloprost in a dosage of up to 4.5 ng/kg/min for a total of 15 months, her 6 min walking-distance improved from 210 to 315 m, the pulmonary vascular resistance decreased from 1710 to 1111 dynxsxcm-5 and the mean pulmonary arterial pressure decreased from 64 to 54 mmHg.
This partial success of conservative treatment enabled a reassessment of the necessity for heart and lung transplantation.
In the USA, recombinant tissue plasminogen activator (rt-PA) has been approved for therapy of acute ischemic stroke (AIS) within a 3 hour time window based on the results of the NINDS [1] trial.
